Bookmarks 

London, Chicago and Melbourne 



The Mass Strike 

Rosa Luxemburg 



with an introduction by Tony Cliff 




Published September 1986 

Bookmarks, 265 Seven Sisters Road, Finsbury Park, London, England 
Bookmarks PO Box 16085, Chicago, Illinois 60616, USA. 

Bookmarks, GPO Box 1473N, Melbourne 3001, Australia. 

ISBN 0 906224 29 2 

Typeset by Kate Macpherson, Clevedon. 

Design by Roger Huddle. 

Printed by Cox and Wyman Limited, Reading, England. 

Bookmarks is linked with an international grouping of socialist orgnisations: 

AUSTRALIA: International Socialists, GPO Box 1473N, Melbourne 3001. 
BRITAIN: Socialist Workers Party, PO Box 82, London E3. 

CANADA: International Socialists, PO Box 339, Station E, Toronto, Ontario. 
DENMARK: Internationale Socialister, Morten Borupsgade 18, kid, 8000 
Arhus C. 

FRANCE: Socialisme International (correspondence to Yves Coleman, BP 
407, Paris Cedex 05). 

IRELAND: Socialist Workers Movement, PO Box 1648, Dublin 8. 
NORWAY : Intemasjonale Sosialister, Postboks 5370 Majorstua, 0304 Oslo 3. 
UNITED STATES: International Socialist Organization, PO Box 16085, 
Chicago, Illinois 60616. 

WEST GERMANY : Sozialistische Arbeiter Gruppe, Wolfgangstrasse 8 1 , 
D-6000 Frankfurt 1. 



Contents 



Introduction by Tony Cliff 

1 . The Russian Revolution, Anarchism and the General Strike / 13 

2. The Mass Strike, a Historical and not an Artificial Product / 18 

3. Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia / 23 

4. The Interaction of the Political and the Economic Struggle / 46 

5 . Lessons of the Working-Class Movement in Russia Applicable to 
Germany / 57 

6 . Co-operation of Organised and U norganised W orkers N ecessary 
for Victory / 64 

7. The Role of the Mass Strike in the Revolution / 71 

8. Need for United Action of Trade Unions and Social 
Democracy / 79 



Editor’s Notes / 93 



Rosa Luxemburg was born in Poland in 1871. She was an 
active socialist from an early age, representing the Polish Social 
Democratic Party at the Congress of the Second International when 
only 22. Most of her life was spent in Germany, where she wrote for 
— and sometimes edited — socialist publications, making many 
important theoretical contributions to the debates within the German 
Social Democratic Party. On the outbreak of the First World War in 
1914, she was among the few members of the SPD who refused to 
support the war. Released from prison in November 1918, she threw 
all her energy into the revolution that followed Germany’s defeat. 
She was murdered by reactionary troops in January 1919. 

Tony Cliff is a member of the Socialist Workers Party in 
Britain. His many books include Rosa Luxemburg, a political 
biography written in 1959 and re-published by Bookmarks in 1980. 



jfjMl This book is published with the aid of the Bookmarks Publishing 
Co-operative. Many socialists have a few savings put aside, probably 
in a bank or savings bank. While it’s there, this money is being 
re-loaned by the bank to some business or other to further the aims 
of capitalism. We believe it is better to loan to a socialist venture to 
further the struggle for socialism. That’s how the co-operative works: 
in return for a loan, repayable at a month’s notice, members receive 
free copies of books published by Bookmarks. The co-operative 
currently has about 130 members, from as far apart as London and 
Australia, Aberdeen and New York. 

Like to know more? Write to the Bookmarks Publishing 
Co-operative, 265 Seven Sisters Road, Finsbury Park, London 
N4 2DE, England. 



INTRODUCTION 



ROSA LUXEMBURG’S classic work, whose full title is The Mass 
Strike, the Political Party and the Trade Unions, is by far the most 
brilliant exposition on the mass strike. In this short book she deals 
with the role of the mass strike in forging the working class into a 
fighting unit, in bringing about their spiritual growth, in changing 
them so that they become able to change society. 

Writing in August 1906, Rosa Luxemburg sketches the rising 
waves of strike action in Russia in the ten years 1896-1905. In May 
1896 there was a general strike of 40,000 textile workers in the 
capital, St Petersburg, followed by another in 1897. This was fol- 
lowed by a whole number of small strikes until the next mass strike 
in March 1902, of petroleum workers in the Caucasus. Then in 
November of the same year a mass strike by railwaymen in Rostov 
turned into a general strike. In May, June and July 190B the whole of 
South Russia was aflame: Baku, Tiflis, Batum, Elizavetgrad, Odessa, 
Kiev, Nikolayev and Ekaterinoslav were in the grip of a general 
strike. The year 1904 brought war with Japan, and for a time there 
was a pause in the strike movement. But this ended with the defeat 
of the Tsarist army and navy at the hands of the Japanese — and in 
December 1904 a general strike broke out in Baku. 

Before this news had time to reach all parts of the Tsarist 
empire, a mass strike broke out in St Petersburg in January 1905. It 
was the start of the Russian revolution of 1905: 

The sudden general rising of the proletariat in January under 

the powerful impetus of the St Petersburg events was outwardly a 



Introduction 



5 



political act of the revolutionary declaration of war on absolut- 
ism. But this first general direct action reacted all the more 
powerfully as it for the first time awoke class feeling and class 
consciousness in milli ons upon millions as if by an electric shock. 
And this awakening of class feeling expressed itself forthwith in 
the circumstances that the proletarian mass, counted by millions, 
quite suddenly and sharply came to realise how intolerable was 
that social and economic existence which they had patiently 
endured for decades in the chains of capitalism. Thereupon 
there began a spontaneous general shaking of and tugging at 
these chains. All the innumerable sufferings of the modern 
proletariat reminded them of the old bleeding wounds. Here 
was the eight-hour day fought for, there piece-work was resisted, 
here were brutal foremen ‘driven off in a sack on a handcart, at 
another place infamous systems of fines were fought against, 
everywhere better wages were striven for and here and there the 
abolition of homework. 

Mass economic strikes led to confrontation with the Tsarist 
regime, its police and army, and this led directly to political strikes. 
The latter awakened previously dormant workers to undertake 
economic strikes to improve their conditions, and the economic 
strikes again gave new impetus to the political strikes. 

The mass strike overcomes the separation of economics and 
politics that is inherent in reformism (as well as in its symmetrical 
opposite, syndicalism). The mass strike fuses together the struggle 
for reforms inside capitalism with the struggle for the revolutionary 
overthrow of capitalism. The mass strike is a bridge _betwesn the, 
T|prp _anrl npw an d the social ist future. 

v, In the mass strike workers stop being onlookers of history , or a 

\ stage army; they step into the historical arena, shaping their future 
' and re-forging themselves: 

^ In former bourgeois revolutions where, on the one hand, the 
political education and leadership of the revolutionary masses 
was undertaken by the bourgeois parties, and on the other hand 
the revolutionary task was limited to the overthrow of the gov- 
ernment, the short battle-onj he barricades was the appropriate 



6 



The Mass Strike 



form of revolutionary struggle. Today, at a time that the working 
class musf educate, orgafttse anddead itself in the course of the 
revolutionary" Struggle, when the revolution itself is directed 
riot only against the established state power but also against 
capitalist exploitation, mass strikes appear as the natural method 
to mobilise the broadest possible proletarian layers into action, 
to revolutionise and organise them. Simultaneously it is a method 
by means of which to undermine and overthrow the established 
state power as well as to curb capitalist exploitation . . . 

In order that the working class may participate en masse in any 
direct political action, it must first organise itself, which above 
all means that it must obliterate the boundaries between factories 
and workshops, mines and foundries, it must overcome the 
split between workshops which the daily yoke of capitalism 
condemns it to. Therefore the mass strike is the first natural 
spontaneous form of every great revolutionary proletarian action. 
The more industry becomes the prevalent form of the economy, 
the more prominent the role of the working class, and the more 
developed the conflict between labour and capital, the more 
powerful and decisive become the mass strikes. The earlier 
main form of bourgeois revolutions, the battle on the barricades, 
the open encounter with the armed state power, is a peripheral 
aspect of the revolution today, only one moment of the whole 
process of the mass struggle of the proletariat. 

Contrary to all reformists, who see a ‘Great Wall of China’ 
dividing partial struggles for economic reform and the political 
struggle for revolution, Rosa Luxemburg pointed out that in a 
revolutionary period the economic struggle grows into a political 
one, and vice versa: 

The movement does not go only in one direction, from an 
economic to a political struggle, but also in the opposite direc- 
tion. Every important political mass action, after reaching its 
peak, results in a series of economic mass strikes. And this rule 
applies not only to the individual mass strike, but to the revolu- 
tion as a whole. With the spread, clarification and intensification 
of the political struggle, not only does the economic struggle not 



Introduction 



7 



recede, but on the contrary it spreads and at the same time 
becomes more organised and intensified. 

There exists a reciprocal influence between the two struggles. 
Every fresh attack and victory of the political struggle has a 
powerful impact on the economic struggle, in that at the same 
time as it widens the scope for the workers to improve their 
conditions and strengthens their impulse to do so, it enhances 
their fighting spirit. After every soaring wave of political action, 
there remains a fertile sediment from which sprout a thousand 
economic struggles. And the reverse also applies. The workers’ 
constant economic struggle against capital sustains them at 
every pause in the political battle. The economic struggle 
constitutes, so to speak, the permanent reservoir of working- 
class strength from which political struggle always imbibes new 
strength. 

In a word, the economic struggle is the factor that advances the 
movement from one political focal point to another. The political 
struggle periodically fertilises the ground for the economic 
struggle. Cause and effect interchange every second. Thus we 
find that the two elements, the economic and political, do not 
incline to separate themselves from one another during the 
period of the mass strikes in Russia, not to speak of negating 
one another as pedantic schemes would suggest. 

The logical and necessary climax of the mass strike is ‘the open 
uprisings which can only be realised as the culmination of a series of 
partial uprisings which prepare the ground, and therefore are liable 
to end for a time in what looks like partial “defeats”, each of which 
may seem to be “premature”.’ 

For Rosa Luxemburg, ‘the most precious thing, because it is 
the most enduring, in the sharp ebb and flow of the revolutionary 
wave, is the proletariat’s spiritual growth. The advance by leaps and 
bounds of the intellectual stature of the proletariat affords an inviol- 
able guarantee of its further progress in the inevitable economic and 
political struggles ahead.’ 

And what idealism workers rise to! They put aside thoughts of 
whether they have the wherewithal to support themselves and their 



8 



The Mass Strike 



families during the struggle. They do not ask whether all the pre- 
liminary technical preparations have been made. The mass strike 
can ‘generate such a tremendous volume of idealism among the 
masses that they appear to become almost immune to the most 
terrible privations.’ 

Rosa Luxemburg’s account concentrates on the great dissolving 
effect of the mass strike on the boundaries between economics and 
politics in workers’ struggles. But she is also clear that it tends to 
dissolve other barriers as well — such as sectionalism and regionalism 
— at the same time as demonstrating the unbridgeable gulf between 
workers’ interests and those of the bosses and their state. 

Rosa Luxemburg’s The Mass Strike, however, suffers from a 
serious weakness: it underestimates the damaging effect that the 
conservative trade union bureaucracy may have on the mass struggle. 
She believed that the upsurge of the masses would sweep aside such 
a leadership without the movement itself suffering serious damage. 
She wrote in 1906: 

If, at any time and under any circumstances, Germany were to 
experience big political struggles, an era of tremendous economic 
struggles would at the same time open up. Events would not 
stop for a second in order to ask the union leaders whether they 
had given their blessing to the movement or not. If they stood 
aside from the movement or opposed it, the result of such 
behaviour would be only this: the union or party leaders would 
be swept away by the wave of events and the economic as well as 
the political struggles would be fought to a conclusion without 
them. 

This theme Rosa Luxemburg reiterated again and again. 

Yet even in Russia, where the trade unions were very young and 
the bureaucracy relatively weak, it needed the victory of the October 
revolution to break the power of the bureaucracy over the unions, 
and the power of the Right, the Mensheviks, inside them. 

Before the 1905 revolution unions hardly existed in Russia. It is 
true that in 1901 a police chief called Colonel Zubatov organised a 
sort of union. In Petrograd it was called the Society for Mutual Aid 
for Workers in Mechanical Industries. Similar societies were founded 



Introduction 



9 



in other cities. But when, after two years, these began to get out of 
hand, they were liquidated. The only authentic union established 
was that of the printers, founded in 1903. 

While the Bolsheviks managed, shortly before the October 
revolution, to take control of the soviets of Petrograd, Moscow and a 
number of other industrial towns, of the factory committees and 
trade unions in major industries, they failed to take hold of the 
printers’ union, the railway workers’ association and the postal and 
telegraph unions. It took a revolution to smash the bureaucracy of 
the printers’ union — a union that had existed for only fourteen 
years. In Britain, the print union SOGAT has existed (under various 
names) for 203 years, and the NGA for two and a half centuries! In 
Tsarist Russia a union bureaucrat often ended up in Siberia; in 
Britain they end up in the House of Lords. 

Rosa Luxemburg’s underestimation of the power of the bureau- 
cracy in the unions as well as that of the Social Democratic parties, 
led her to underestimate the need for a revolutionary party. 

Rosa Luxemburg’s The Mass Strike is crucial for understanding 
the revolutionary mass strikes of Russia and Poland in 1905, the 
factory occupations in Italy in 1920, the occupation of the factories 
in France in 1936, the Hungarian general strike of 1956, and Poland’s 
Solidamosc in 1980-1. An understanding of the conservative, reac- 
tionary nature of the trade union bureaucracy is necessary to under- 
stand the bureaucratic mass strikes of Sweden 1909, Belgium 1913, 
Britain 1926, the British miners’ strike 1984-5, the public sector 
strikes in Holland and Belgium 1984, and the general strike in 
Denmark 1985. 

Of course there is no Chinese wall between the bureaucratic 
mass strike and a spontaneous mass strike. Workers may get out of 
the control of the bureaucracy even in the most tightly controlled 
strike, especially if the employers or bureaucrats make serious mis- 
takes. A revolutionary workers’ party can play a crucial role in 
breaking the bounds of the bureaucratic strike. 

Rosa Luxemburg’s enduring strength lay in her complete con- 
fidence in workers’ historical initiative. 

Tony Cliff 



10 



The Mass Strike 



THE MASS STRIKE 

THE POLITICAL PARTY AND THE TRADE UNIONS 



Chapter One 



THE RUSSIAN REVOLUTION, ANARCHISM AND THE 
GENERAL STRIKE 



ALMOST ALL works and pronouncements of international socialism 
on the subject of the mass strike date from the time before the 
Russian Revolution [of 1905], 1 the first historical experiment on a 
very large scale with this means of struggle. It is therefore evident 
that they are, for the most part, out-of-date. Their standpoint is 
essentially that of Engels who in 1873 wrote as follows in his criticism 
of the revolutionary blundering of the Bakuninists in Spain: 

The general strike, in the Bakuninists’ programme, is the lever 
which will be used for introducing the social revolution. One 
fine morning all the workers in every industry in a country, or 
perhaps in every country, will cease work, and thereby compel 
the ruling classes either to submit in about four weeks, or to 
launch an attack on the workers so that the latter will have the 
right to defend themselves, and may use the opportunity to 
overthrow the old society. The proposal is by no means new: 
French and Belgian socialists have paraded it continually since 
1848, but for all that it is of English origin. During the rapid 
and powerful development of Chartism among the English 
workers that followed the crisis of 1837 , the ‘holy month’ — a 
suspension of work on a national scale — was preached as early 
as 1839, and was received with such favour that in July 1842 the 
factory workers of the north of England attempted to carry it 
out. And at the Congress of the Alliancists at Geneva on 1 
September 1873, the general strike played a great part, but it 
was admitted on all sides that to carry it out it was necessary to 



The Russian Revolution, Anarchism and the General Strike 



13 



have a perfect organisation of the working class and a full war 
chest. And that is the crux of the question. On the one hand, 
the governments, especially if they are encouraged by the 
workers’ abstention from political action, will never allow the 
funds of the workers to become large enough, and on the other 
hand, political events and the encroachments of the ruling 
classes will bring about the liberation of the workers long before 
the proletariat get the length of forming this ideal organisation 
and this colossal reserve fund. But if they had these, they would 
not need to make use of the roundabout way of the general 
strike in order to attain their object. 

Here we have the reasoning that was characteristic of the 
attitude of international social democracy towards the mass strike in 
the following decades. It is based on the anarchist theory of the 
general strike — that is, the theory of the general strike as a means of 
inaugurating the social revolution, in contradiction to the daily 
political struggle of the working class — and exhausts itself in the 
following simple dilemma: either the proletariat as a whole are not 
yet in possession of the powerful organisation and financial resources 
required, in which case they cannot carry through the general strike: 
or they are already sufficiently well organised, in which case they do 
not need the general strike. This reasoning is so simple and at first 
glance so irrefutable that, for a quarter of a century, it has rendered 
excellent service to the modern labour movement as a logical weapon 
against the anarchist phantom and as a means of carrying the idea of 
political struggle to the widest circles of the workers. The enormous 
strides taken by the labour movement in all capitalist countries 
during the last twenty-five years are the most convincing evidence of 
the value of the tactics of political struggle, which was insisted upon 
by Marx and Engels in opposition to Bakuninism; and German 
social democracy , 2 in its position of vanguard of the entire inter- 
national labour movement, is not in the least the direct product of 
the consistent and energetic application of these tactics. 

The Russian Revolution has now effected a radical revision of 
the above piece of reasoning. For the first time in the history of the 
class struggle it has achieved a grandiose realisation of the idea of the 
mass strike and — as we shall discuss later — has even matured the 



14 



The Mass Strike 



general strike and thereby opened a new epoch in the development 
of the labour movement. It does not, of course, follow from this that 
the tactics of political struggle recommended by Marx and Engels 
were false or that the criticism applied by them to anarchism was 
incorrect. On the contrary, it is the same train of ideas, the same 
method, the Engels-Marxian tactics, which lay at the foundation of 
the previous practice of the German social democracy, which now in 
the Russian Revolution are producing new factors and new conditions 
in the class struggle. The Russian Revolution, which is the first 
historical experiment on the model of the mass strike, not merely 
does not afford a vindication of anarchism, but actually means the 
historical liquidation of anarchism. The sorry existence to which this 
mental tendency was condemned in recent decades by the powerful 
development of social democracy in Germany may, to a certain 
extent, be explained by the exclusive dominion and long duration of 
the parliamentary period. A tendency patterned entirely upon the 
‘first blow’ and ‘direct action’, a tendency ‘revolutionary’ in the most 
naked, pitchfork sense, can only temporarily languish in the calm of 
the parliamentarian day and, on a return of the period of direct open 
struggle, can come to life again and unfold its inherent strength. 
Russia, in particular, appeared to have become the experimental 
field for the heroic deeds of anarchism. A country in which the 
proletariat had absolutely no political rights and extremely weak 
organisations, a many-coloured complex of various sections of the 
population, a chaos of conflicting interests, a low standard of educa- 
tion amongst the masses of the people, extreme brutality in the use 
of violence on the part of the prevailing regime — all this seemed as if 
created to raise anarchism to a sudden if perhaps short-lived power. 
And finally, Russia was the historical birthplace of anarchism. But 
the fatherland of Bakunin was to become the burial place of its 
teachings. Not only did and do the anarchists in Russia not stand at 
the head of the mass strike movement; not only does the whole 
political leadership of revolutionary action and also of the mass 
strike lie in the hands of the social democratic organisations, which 
are bitterly opposed as ‘bourgeois parties’ by the Russian anarchists, 
or partly in the hands of such socialist organisations as are more or 
less influenced by the social democracy and more or less approximate 



The Russian Revolution, Anarchism and the General Strike 



15 



to it — such as the terrorist party, the ‘socialist revolutionaries’ — 
but the anarchists simply do not exist as a serious political tendency 
in the Russian Revolution. Only in a small Lithuanian town with 
particularly difficult conditions — a confused medley of different 
nationalities among the workers, an extremely scattered condition of 
small-scale industry, a very severely oppressed proletariat — in 
Bialystock, there is, amongst the seven or eight different revolu- 
tionary groups, a handful of half-grown ‘anarchists’ who promote 
confusion and bewilderment amongst the workers to the best of 
their ability; and lastly in Moscow, and perhaps in two or three other 
towns, a handful of people of this kidney make themselves notice- 
able. But apart from these few ‘revolutionary’ groups, what is the 
actual role of anarchism in the Russian Revolution? It has become 
the sign of the common thief and plunderer; a large proportion of the 
innumerable thefts and acts of plunder of private persons are carried 
out under the name of ‘anarchist-communism’ — acts which arise 
up like a troubled wave against the revolution in every period of 
depression and in every period of temporary defensive. Anarchism 
has become in the Russian Revolution, not the theory of the 
struggling proletariat, but the ideological sign-board of the counter- 
revolutionary lumpenproletariat , 3 who, like a school of sharks, swarm 
in the wake of the battleship of the revolution. And therewith the 
historical career of anarchism is well-nigh ended. 

On the other hand, the mass strike in Russia has been realised 
not as a means of evading the political struggle of the working class, 
and especially of parliamentarism, not as a means of jumping sud- 
denly into the social revolution by means of a theatrical coup, but as 
a means, firstly, of creating for the proletariat the conditions of the 
daily political struggle and especially of parliamentarism. The revolu- 
tionary struggle in Russia, in which mass strikes are the most im- 
portant weapon, is, by the working people, and above all by the 
proletariat, conducted for those political rights and conditions whose 
necessity and importance in the struggle for the emancipation of the 
working class Marx and Engels first pointed out, and in opposition 
to anarchism fought for with all their might in the International . 4 
Thus has historical dialectics, the rock on which the whole teaching 
of Marxian socialism rests, brought it about that today anarchism, 



16 



The Mass Strike 



with which the idea of the mass strike is indissolubly associated, has 
itself come to be opposed to the mass strike in practice; while on the 
contrary, the mass strike which, as the opposite of the political 
activity of the proletariat, was combatted appears today as the most 
powerful weapon of the struggle for political rights. If, therefore, the 
Russian Revolution makes imperative a fundamental revision of the 
old standpoint of Marxism on the question of the mass strike, it is 
once again Marxism whose general methods and points of view have 
thereby, in a new form, carried off the prize. The Moor’s beloved 
can die only by the hand of the Moor. 



The Russian Revolution, Anarchism and the General Strike 



17 



Chapter Two 



THE MASS STRIKE, AN HISTORICAL AND NOT 
AN ARTIFICIAL PRODUCT 



THE FIRST revision of the question of the mass strike which results 
from the experience of Russia relates to the general conception of the 
problem. Till the present time the zealous advocates of an ‘attempt 
with the mass strike’ in Germany of the stamp of Bernstein, Eisner, 
etc. , 5 and also the strongest opponents of such an attempt as repre- 
sented in the trade union camp by, for example, Bomelburg, stand, 
when all is said and done, on the same conception, and that the 
anarchist one. The apparent polar opposites do not mutually exclude 
each other but, as always, condition, and at the same time, supple- 
ment each other. For the anarchist mode of thought is direct specula- 
tion on the ‘great Kladderadatsch’ , e on the social revolution merely as 
an external and inessential characteristic. According to it, what is 
essential is the whole abstract, unhistorical view of the mass strike 
and of all the conditions of the proletarian struggle generally. 

For the anarchist there exist only two things as material sup- 
positions of his ‘revolutionary’ speculations — first imagination, and 
second goodwill and courage to rescue humanity from the existing 
capitalist vale of tears. This fanciful mode of reasoning sixty years 
ago gave the result that the mass strike was the shortest, surest and 
easiest means of springing into the better social future. The same 
mode of reasoning recently gave the result that the trade-union 
struggle was the only real ‘direct action of the masses’ and also the 
only real revolutionary struggle — which, as is well known, is the 
latest notion of the French and Italian ‘syndicalists’ . The fatal thing 
for anarchism has always been that the methods of struggle im- 
provised in the air were not only a reckoning without their host, that 



18 



The Mass Strike 



is, they were purely utopian, but that they, while not reckoning in 
the least with the despised evil reality, unexpectedly became, in this 
evil reality, practical helps to the reaction, where previously they 
had only been, for the most part, revolutionary speculations. 

On the same ground of abstract, unhistorical methods of ob- 
servation stand those today who would, in the manner of a board of 
directors, put the mass strike in Germany on the calendar on an 
appointed day, and those who, like the participants in the trade-union 
congress at Cologne, would by a prohibition of ‘propaganda’ eliminate 
the problem of the mass strike from the face of the earth. Both 
tendencies proceed on the common purely anarchistic assumption 
that the mass strike is a purely technical means of struggle which can 
be ‘decided’ at pleasure and strictly according to conscience, or ‘for- 
bidden’ — a kind of pocket-knife which can be kept in the pocket 
clasped ‘ready for any emergency’, and according to decision, can be 
unclasped and used. The opponents of the mass strike do indeed claim 
for themselves the merit of taking into consideration the historical 
groundwork and the material conditions of the present situation in 
Germany in opposition to the ‘revolutionary romanticists’ who hover 
in air, and do not at any point reckon with the present situation and 
I heir possibilities and impossibilities. ‘Facts and figures; figures and 
facts!’ they cry, like Mr Gradgrind in Dickens’ Hard Times. 

What the trade union opponent of the mass strike understands 
by the ‘historical basis’ and ‘material conditions’ is two things — on 
t he one hand the weakness of the proletariat, and on the other hand, 
1 he strength of Prussian-German militarism. The inadequate organ- 
isation of the workers and the imposing Prussian bayonet — these are 
i he facts and figures upon which these trade-union leaders base their 
practical policy in the given case. Now it is quite true that the trade- 
union cash box and the Prussian bayonet are material and very histori- 
, a I phenomena, but the conception based upon them is not historical 
materialism in Marx’s sense but a policemanlike materialism in the 
sense of Puttkammer. The representatives of the capitalist police state 
reckon much, and indeed, exclusively, with the occasional real power 
of the organised proletariat as well as with the material might of the 
bayonet, and from the comparative example of these two rows of fig- 
ures the comforting conclusion is always drawn that the revolutionary 



The mass strike an historical and not an artificial product 



19 



labour movement is produced by individual demagogues and agita- 
tors; and that therefore there is in the prisons and bayonets an 
adequate means of subduing the unpleasant ‘passing phenomena’. 

The class-conscious German workers have at last grasped the 
humour of the policemanlike theory that the whole modem labour 
movement is an artificial arbitrary product of a handful of conscience- 
less ‘demagogues and agitators’. 

It is exactly the same conception, however, that finds expression 
when two or three worthy comrades unite in a voluntary column of 
night-watchmen in order to warn the German working class against 
the dangerous agitation of a few ‘revolutionary romanticists’ and 
their ‘propaganda of the mass strike’; or, when, on the other side, a 
noisy indignation campaign is engineered by those who, by means of 
‘confidential’ agreements between the executive of the party and the 
general commission of the trade unions, believe they can prevent the 
outbreak of the mass strike in Germany. 

If it depended on the inflammatory ‘propaganda’ of revolution- 
ary romanticists or on confidential or public decisions of the party 
direction, then we should not even yet have had in Russia a single 
serious mass strike. In no country in the world — as I pointed out in 
March 1905 in the Sachische Arbeiterzeitung — was the mass 
strike so little ‘propagated’ or even ‘discussed’ as in Russia. And the 
isolated examples of decisions and agreements of the Russian party 
executive which really sought to proclaim the mass strike of their 
own accord — as, for example, the last attempt in August of this year 
after the dissolution of the Duma 7 — are almost valueless. 

If, therefore, the Russian Revolution teaches us anything, it 
teaches above all that the mass strike is not artificially ‘made’, not 
‘decided’ at random, not ‘propagated’, but that it is an historical 
phenomenon which, at a given moment, results from social conditions 
with historical inevitability. It is not therefore by abstract speculations 
on the possibility or impossibility, the utility or the injuriousness of 
the mass strike, but only by an examination of those factors and 
social conditions out of which the mass strike grows in the present 
phase of the class struggle — in other words, it is not by subjective 
criticism of the mass strike from the standpoint of what is desirable, 
but only by objective investigation of the sources of the mass strike 



20 



The Mass Strike 



from the standpoint of what is historically inevitable, that the prob- 
lem can be grasped or even discussed. 

In the unreal sphere of abstract logical analysis it can be shown 
with exactly the same force on either side that the mass strike is 
absolutely impossible and sure to be defeated, and that it is possible 
and that its triumph cannot be questioned. And therefore the value 
of the evidence led on each side is exactly the same — and that is nil. 
Therefore the fear of the ‘propagation’ of the mass strike, which has 
even led to formal anathemas against the persons alleged to be guilty 
of this crime, is solely the product of the droll confusion of persons. 
It is just as impossible to ‘propagate’ the mass strike as an abstract 
means of struggle as it is to propagate the ‘revolution’. ‘Revolution’, 
like ‘mass strike’, signifies nothing but an external form of the class 
s t ruggle, which can have sense and meaning only in connection with 
definite political situations. 

If anyone were to undertake to make the mass strike generally, 
as a form of proletarian action, the object of methodical agitation, 
and to go house-to-house canvassing with this ‘idea’ in order gradually 
lo win the working class to it, it would be as idle and profidess and 
absurd an occupation as it would be to seek to make the idea of the 
revolution or of the fight at the barricades the object of a special 
agitation. The mass strike has now become the centre of the lively 
interest of the German and the international working class because it 
is a new form of struggle, and as such is the sure symptom of a 
i horough-going internal revolution in the relations of the classes and 
hi the conditions of the class struggle. It is a testimony to the sound 
revolutionary instinct and to the quick intelligence of the mass of the 
< .erman proletariat that, in spite of the obstinate resistance of their 
i rude union leaders, they are applying themselves to this new problem 
with such keen interest. 

But it does not meet the case, in the presence of this interest and 
i il this fine, intellectual thirst and desire for revolutionary deeds on 
I he part of the workers, to treat them to abstract mental gymnastics 
i in the possibility or impossibility of the mass strike; they should be 
enlightened on the development of the Russian Revolution, the 
international significance of that revolution, the sharpening of class 
iiitagonisms in Western Europe, the wider political perspectives of 



I he mass strike an historical and not an artificial product 



21 



the class struggle in Germany, and the role and the tasks of the 
masses in the coming struggles. Only in this form will the discussion 
on the mass strike lead to the widening of the intellectual horizon of 
the proletariat, to the sharpening of their way of thinking, and to the 
steeling of their energy. 

Viewed from this standpoint, however, the criminal proceedings 
desired by the enemies of ‘revolutionary romanticism’ appear in all 
their absurdity, because, in treating of the problem, one does not 
adhere strictly to the text of the Jena resolution . 8 The ‘practical 
politicians agree to this resolution if need be, because they couple 
the mass strike chiefly with the fate of universal suffrage, from 
which it follows that they can believe two things — first, that the 
mass strike is of a purely defensive character, and second, that the 
mass strike is even subordinate to parliamentarism, that is, has been 
turned into a mere appendage of parliamentarism. But the real 
kernel of the Jena resolution in this connection is that in the present 
position of Germany an attempt on the part of the prevailing reaction 
on the parliamentary vote would in all probability be the moment for 
the introduction of, and the signal for, a period of stormy political 
struggles in which the mass strike as a means of struggle in Germany 
might well come into use for the first time. 

But to seek to narrow and to artificially smother the social 
importance, and to limit the historical scope, of the mass strike as a 
phenomenon and as a problem of the class struggle by the wording of 
a congress resolution, is an undertaking which for short-sightedness 
can only be compared with the veto on discussion of the trade union 
congress at Cologne . 9 In the resolution of the Jena Congress, German 
social democracy has officially taken notice of the fundamental 
change which the Russian revolution has effected in the international 
conditions of the proletarian class struggle, and has announced its 
capacity for revolutionary development and its power of adaptability 
to the new demands of the coming phase of the class struggle. 
Therein lies the significance of the Jena resolution. As for the 
practical application of the mass strike in Germany, history will 
decide that as it has decided it in Russia — history in which German 
Social Democracy with its decisions is, it is true, an important 
factor, but, at the same time, only one factor amongst many. 



22 



The Mass Strike 



Chapter Three 



DEVELOPMENT OF THE MASS STRIKE 
MOVEMENT IN RUSSIA 



THE MASS strike, as it appears for the most part in the discussion in 
Germany, is a very clear and simply thought-out, sharply sketched, 
isolated phenomenon. It is the political mass strike exclusively that 
is spoken of. What is meant by it is a single grand rising of the 
industrial proletariat springing from some political motive of the 
highest importance, and undertaken on the basis of an opportune 
and mutual understanding on the part of the controlling authorities 
of the party and of the trade unions, and carried through in the spirit 
of party discipline and in perfect order, and in still more perfect 
order brought to the directing committees at a signal given at the 
proper time, by which committees the regulation of support, the 
cost, the sacrifice — in a word, the whole material balance of the 
mass strike — is exactly determined in advance. 

Now, when we compare this theoretical scheme with the real 
mass strike, as it appeared in Russia five years ago, we are compelled 
to say that this representation which, in the German discussion 
occupies the central position, hardly corresponds to a single one of 
the many mass strikes that have taken place, and on the other hand 
that the mass strike in Russia displays such a multiplicity of the most 
varied forms of action that it is altogether impossible to speak of ‘the’ 
mass strike, of an abstract schematic mass strike. All the factors of 
the mass strike, as well as its character, are not only different in the 
different towns and districts of the country, but its general character 
has often changed in the course of the revolution. The mass strike 
has passed through a definite history in Russia and is passing still 
further through it. Who, therefore, speaks of the mass strike in 

Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia 23 



Russia must, above all things, keep its history before his eyes. 

The present official period, so to speak, of the Russian Revolu- 
tion is justly dated from the rising of the proletariat on 22 January 
1905, when the demonstration of 200,000 workers ended in a frightful 
bloodbath before the czar’s palace. The bloody massacre in St 
Petersburg was, as is well known, the signal for the outbreak of the 
first gigantic series of mass strikes which spread over the whole of 
Russia within a few days and which carried the call to action of the 
revolution from St Petersburg to every corner of the empire and 
amongst the widest sections of the proletariat. But the St Petersburg 
rising of 22 January was only the critical moment of a mass strike 
which the proletariat of the czarist capital had previously entered 
upon in January 1905. This January mass strike was without doubt 
earned through under the immediate influence of the gigantic general 
strike which in December 1904 broke out in the Caucasus, in Baku, 
and for a long time kept the whole of Russia in suspense. The events 
of December in Baku were on their pan only the last and powerful 
ramification of those tremendous mass strikes which, like a periodical 
earthquake, shook the whole of south Russia, and whose prologue 
was the mass strike in Batum in the Caucasus in March 1902. 

This first mass strike movement in the continuous series of 
present revolutionary eruptions is, finally, separated by five or six 
years from the great general strike of the textile workers in St 
Petersburg in 1896 and 1897, and if this movement is apparently 
separated from the present revolution by a few years of apparent 
stagnation and strong reaction, everyone who knows the inner poli- 
tical development of the Russian proletariat to their present stage of 
class consciousness and revolutionary energy, will realise that the 
history of the present period of the mass struggle begins with those 
general strikes in St Petersburg. They are therefore important for 
the problems of the mass strike because they already contain, in the 
germ, all the principal factors of later mass strikes. 

Again, the St Petersburg general strike of 1896 appears as a 
purely economic partial wage struggle. Its causes were the intolerable 
working conditions of the spinners and weavers in St Petersburg; a 
working day of thirteen, fourteen or fifteen hours, miserable piece- 
work rates, and a whole series of contemptible chicaneries on the 



24 



The Mass Strike 



part of the employers. The condition of things, however, was patiendy 
endured by the workers for a long time till an apparendy trivial 
circumstance filled the cup to overflowing. The coronation of the 
present czar, Nicholas II, which had been postponed for two years 
through fear of the revolutionaries, was celebrated in May 1896, and 
on that occasion the St Petersburg employers displayed their patriotic 
zeal by giving their workers three days compulsory holidays, for 
which, curious to relate, they did not desire to pay their employees. 
The workers angered at this began to move. After a conference of 
about 300 of the intelligent workers in the Ekaterinhof Garden a 
strike was decided upon, and the following demands were formul- 
ated: first, payment of wages for the coronation holidays; second, a 
working day of ten hours; third, increased rates for piecework. This 
happened on 24 May. In a week every weaving and spinning estab- 
lishment was at a standstill, and 40,000 workers were in the general 
strike. Today this event, measured by the gigantic mass strike of the 
revolution, may appear a little thing. In the political polar rigidity of 
the Russia of that time a general strike was something unheard of; it 
was even a complete revolution in miniature. There began, of course, 
the most brutal persecution. About one thousand workers were 
arrested and the general strike was suppressed. 

Here already we see all the fundamental characteristics of the 
later mass strikes. The next occasion of the movement was wholly 
accidental, even unimportant, its outbreak elementary; but in the 
success of the movement the fruits of the agitation, extending over 
several years, of the social democracy, 10 were seen and in the course 
of the general strike the social democratic agitators stood at the head 
of the movement, directed it, and used it to stir up revolutionary 
agitation. Further the strike was outwardly a mere economic struggle 
for wages, but the attitude of the government and the agitation of the 
social democracy made it a political phenomenon of the first rank. 
And lastly, the strike was suppressed; the workers suffered a ‘defeat’. 
But in January of the following year the textile workers of St 
Petersburg repeated the general strike once more and achieved this 
time a remarkable success: the legal introduction of a working day of 
eleven hours throughout the whole of Russia. What was nevertheless a 
much more important result was this: since that first general strike 



Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia 



25 



of 1 896 which was entered upon without a trace of organisation or of 
strike funds, an intensive trade union fight began in Russia proper 
which spread from St Petersburg to the other parts of the country and 
opened up entirely new vistas to Social Democratic agitation and 
organisation, and by which in the apparently deathlike peace of the 
following period the revolution was prepared by underground work. 

The outbreak of the Caucasian strike in March 1902 was appar- 
ently as accidental and as much due to purely economic partial 
causes (although produced by quite other factors) as that of 1896. It 
was connected with the serious industrial and commercial crisis 
which in Russia was the precursor of the Japanese war 1 1 and which, 
together with it, was the most powerful factor of the nascent revolu- 
tionary ferment. The crisis produced an enormous mass of un- 
employment which nourished the agitation amongst the proletarian 
masses, and therefore the government, to restore tranquillity amongst 
the workers, undertook to transport the ‘superfluous hands’ in 
batches to their respective home districts. One such measure, which 
was to affect about 400 petroleum workers, called forth a mass protest 
in Batum, which led to demonstrations, arrests, a massacre, and fin- 
ally to a political trial in which the purely economic and partial affair 
suddenly became a political and revolutionary event. The reverbera- 
tion of the wholly ‘fruitless’, expiring and suppressed strike in Batum 
was a series of revolutionary mass demonstrations of workers in 
Nizhni Novgorod, Saratov and other towns, and therefore a mighty 
surge forward of the general wave of the revolutionary movement. 

Already in November 1902 the first genuine revolutionary echo 
followed in the shape of a general strike at Rostov-on-Don. Disputes 
about the rates of pay in the workshops of the Vladicaucasus Railway 
gave the impetus to this movement. The management sought to 
reduce wages and therefore the Don' committee of the social demo- 
cracy issued a proclamation with a summons to strike for the following 
demands: a nine-hour day, increase of wages, abolition of fines, 
dismissal of obnoxious engineers, etc. Entire railway workshops 
participated in the strike. Presently all other industries joined in and 
suddenly an unprecedented state of affairs prevailed in Rostov: 
every industrial work was at a standstill, and every day monster 
meetings of from 15,000 to 20,000 were held in the open air. 



26 



The Mass Strike 



sometimes surrounded by a cordon of Cossacks, 12 at which for the 
first time social democratic popular speakers appeared publicly, 
inflammatory speeches on socialism and political freedom were 
delivered and received with immense enthusiasm, and revolutionary 
appeals were distributed by tens of thousands of copies. In the midst 
of rigid absolutist Russia, the proletariat of Rostov won for the first 
time the right of assembly, and freedom of speech, by storm. It goes 
without saying that there was a massacre here. The disputes over 
wages in the Vladicaucasus Railway workshops grew in a few days 
into a political general strike and a revolutionary street batde. As an 
echo to this there followed immediately a general strike at the station 
of Tichoretzkaia on the same railway. Here also a massacre took 
place and also a trial, and thus even Tichoretzkaia has taken its place 
in the indissoluble chain of the factors of the revolution. 

The spring of 190B gave the answer to the defeated strikes in 
Rostov and Tichoretzkaia; the whole of South Russia in May, June 
and July was aflame. Baku, Tiflis, Batum, Elizavetgrad, Odessa, 
Kiev, Nicholayev and Ekaterinoslav were in a general strike in the 
literal meaning of those words. But here again the movement did not 
arise on any preconceived plan from one another; it flowed together 
from individual points in each one from a different cause and in a 
different form. The beginning was made by Baku where several 
partial wage struggles in individual factories and departments cul- 
minated in a general strike. In Tiflis the strike was begun by 2,000 
commercial employees who had a working day of from six o’clock in 
the morning to eleven at night. On 4 July they all left their shops and 
made a circuit of the town to demand from the proprietors of the 
shops that they close their premises. The victory was complete; the 
commercial employees won a working day of from eight in the 
morning to eight in the evening, and they were immediately joined 
by all the factories, workshops and offices, etc. The newspapers did 
not appear, and tramway traffic could not be carried on under 
military protection. 

In Elizavetgrad on 4 July a strike began in all the factories with 
purely economic demands. These were mostly conceded, and the 
strike ended on the 14th. Two weeks later, however, it broke out 
again. The bakers this time gave the word and they were joined by 



Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia 



27 



the bricklayers, the joiners, the dyers, the mill workers, and finally 
all factory workers. 

In Odessa the movement began with a wage struggle in the 
course of which the ‘legal’ workers’ union, founded by government 
agents according to the programme of the famous gendarme 
Zubatov, 13 was developed. Historical dialectics had again seized the 
occasion to play one of its malicious little pranks. The economic 
struggles of the earlier period (amongst them the great St Petersburg 
general strike of 1896) had misled Russian social democracy into 
exaggerating the importance of so-called ‘economics’, and in this 
way the ground had been prepared amongst the workers for the 
demagogic activities of Zubatov. After a time, however, the great 
revolutionary stream turned round the little ship with the false flag, 
and compelled it to ride right at the head of the revolutionary 
proletarian flotilla. The Zubatovian unions gave the signal for the 
great general strike in Odessa in the spring of 1904, as for the general 
strike in St Petersburg in January 1 905 . The workers in Odessa, who 
were not to be deceived by the appearance of friendliness on the part 
of the government for the workers, and of its sympathy with purely 
economic strikes, suddenly demanded proof by example, and com- 
pelled the Zubatovian ‘workers union’ in a factory to declare a strike 
for very moderate demands. They were immediately thrown on the 
streets, and when they demanded the protection of the authorities 
which was promised them by their leader, the gendeman vanished 
and left the workers in the wildest excitement. 

The social democrats at once placed themselves at the head of 
affairs, and the strike movement extended to other factories. On 1 
July 2,500 dockers struck work for an increase of wages from eighty 
kopeks to two roubles, and the shortening of the working day by half 
an hour. On 16 July the seamen joined the movement. On the 
thirteenth the tramway staff began a strike. Then a meeting took 
place of all the strikers, seven or eight thousand men; they formed a 
procession which went from factory to factory, growing like an 
avalanche, and presently a crowd of forty to fifty thousand betook 
themselves to the docks in order to bring all work there to a standstill. 
A general strike soon reigned throughout the whole city. 

In Kiev a strike began in the railway workshops on 21 July. 



28 



The Mass Strike 



Here also the immediate cause was miserable conditions of labour, 
and wage demands were presented. On the following day the foundry 
men followed the example. On 23 July an incident occurred which 
gave the signal for the general strike. During the night two delegates 
of the railwaymen were arrested. The strikers immediately demanded 
their release, and as this was not conceded, they decided not to allow 
trains to leave the town. At the station all the strikers with their 
wives and families sat down on the railway track — a sea of human 
beings. They were threatened with rifle salvoes. The workers bared 
their breasts and cried ‘Shoot!’ A salvo was fired into the defenceless 
seated crowd, and thirty to forty corpses, amongst them those of 
women and children, remained on the ground. On this becoming 
known the whole town of Kiev went on strike on the same day. The 
corpses of the murdered workers were raised on high by the crowd 
and carried round in a mass demonstration. Meetings, speeches, 
arrests, isolated street fights — Kiev was in the midst of the revolu- 
tion. The movement was soon at an end. But the printers had won a 
shortening of the working day by one hour and a wage increase of 
one rouble; in a yeast factory the eight-hour day was introduced; the 
railway workshops were closed by order of the Ministry; other 
departments continued partial strikes for their demands. 

In Nicholayev the general strike broke out under the immediate 
influence of the news from Odessa, Baku, Batum and Tiflis, in spite 
of the opposition of the social democratic committee who wanted to 
postpone the outbreak of the movement till the time came when the 
military should have left the town for manoeuvres. The masses 
refused to hold back; one factory made a beginning, the strikes went 
from one workshop to another; the resistance of the military only 
poured oil on the fire. Mass processions with revolutionary songs 
were formed which were taken part in by all workers, employees, 
tramways officials, men and women. The cessation of work was 
complete. In Ekaterinoslav the bakers came out on strike on 5 
August, on the 7th the men in the railway workshops, and then all 
the other factories on 8 August. Tramway traffic stopped, and the 
newspapers did not appear. 

Thus the colossal general strike in south Russia came into being 
in the summer of 1903. By many small channels of partial economic 



Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia 



29 



struggle find little ‘accidental’ occurrences, it flowed rapidly to a 
t aging ■.(■,!, and changed the entire south of the czarist empire for 
Nome weeks into a bizarre revolutionary workers’ republic. ‘Brother- 
ly embraces, cries of delight and of enthusiasm, songs of freedom, 
merry laughter, humour and joy, were seen and heard in the crowd 
of many thousands of persons which surged through the town from 
morning till evening. The mood was exalted: one could almost 
believe that a new, better life was beginning on the earth. A most 
solemn and at the same time an idyllic, moving spectacle . . .’So 
wrote at the time the correspondent of the Liberal Osvoboshdenye 
of Peter Struve. 14 

The year 1904 brought with it war, and for a time, an interval of 
quiet in the mass strike movement. At first a troubled wave of 
‘patriotic’ demonstrations arranged by the police authorities spread 
over the country. The ‘liberal’ bourgeois society was for the time 
being struck to the ground by the czarist official chauvinism. But 
soon the social democrats took possession of the arena; revolutionary 
workers’ demonstrations were opposed to the demonstrations of the 
patriotic lumpenproletariat which were organised under police pat- 
ronage. At last the shameful defeats of the czarist army woke the 
liberal society from its lethargy; then began the era of democratic 
congresses, banquets, speeches, addresses, and manifestos. Absol- 
utism, temporarily suppressed through the disgrace of the war, gave 
full scope to these gentlemen, and by and by they saw everything in 
rosy colours. For six months bourgeois liberalism occupied the 
centre of the stage, and the proletariat remained in the shadows. But 
after a long depression absolutism again roused itself, the camarilla 15 
gathered all its strength and by a single powerful movement of the 
Cossack’s heel the whole liberal movement was driven into a corner. 
Banquets, speeches and congresses were prohibited out of hand as 
‘intolerable presumption’, and liberalism suddenly found itself at 
the end of its tether. 

But exactly at the point where liberalism was exhausted, the 
action of the proletariat began. In December 1904 the great general 
strike, due to unemployment, broke out in Baku; the working class 
was again on the field of battle. As speech was forbidden and 
rendered impossible, action began. In Baku for some weeks in the 



30 



The Mass Strike 



midst of the general strike the social democrats ruled as absolute 
masters of the situation, and the peculiar events of December in the 
Caucasus would have caused an immediate sensation if they had not 
been so quickly put in the shade by the rising tide of the revolution 
which they had themselves set in motion. The fantastic confused 
news of the general strike in Baku had not reached all parts of the 
czarist empire when in January 1905 the mass strike in St Petersburg 
broke out. 

Here also, as is well known, the immediate cause was trivial. 
Two men employed at the Putilov works were discharged on account 
of their membership of the legal Zubatovian union. This measure 
called forth a solidarity strike on 16 January of the whole of the 
12,000 employees in this works. The social democrats seized the 
occasion of the strike to begin a lively agitation for the extension of 
the demands and set forth demands for the eight-hour day, the right 
of combination, freedom of speech and of the press, etc. The unrest 
among the Putilov workers communicated itself quickly to the 
remainder of the proletariat, and in a few days 140,000 workers were 
on strike. Joint conferences and stormy discussions led to the working 
out of that proletarian charter of bourgeois freedom 16 with the 
eight-hour day at its head with which, on 22 January, 200,000 
workers, led by Father Gapon, marched to the czar’s palace. The 
conflict of the two Putilov workers who had been subjected to 
disciplinary punishment had changed within a week into the prologue 
of the most violent revolution of modern times. 

The events that followed upon this are well known; the blood- 
bath in St Petersburg 1 7 called forth gigantic mass strikes and general 
strike in the months of January and February in all the industrial 
centres and towns in Russia, Poland, Lithuania, the Baltic Provinces, 
the Caucasus, Siberia, from north to south and east to west. On 
closer inspection, however, it can be seen that the mass strike was 
appearing in other forms than those of the previous period. Every- 
where at that time the social democratic organisations went before 
with appeals; everywhere was revolutionary solidarity with the St 
Petersburg proletariat expressly stated as the cause and aim of the 
general strike; everywhere, at the same time, there were demonstra- 
tions, speeches, conflicts with the military. 



Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia 



31 



But even here there was no predetermined plan, no organised 
action, because the appeals of the parties could scarcely keep pace 
with the spontaneous risings of the masses; the leaders had scarcely 
time to formulate the watch-words of the onrushing crowd of the 
proletariat. Further, the earlier mass and general strikes had orig- 
inated from individual coalescing wage struggles which, in the 
general temper of the revolutionary situation and under the influence 
of the social democratic agitation, rapidly became political demonstra- 
tions; the economic factor and the scattered condition of trade 
unionism were the starting point, all-embracing class action and 
political direction the result. The movement was now reversed. 

The general strikes of January and February broke out as 
unified revolutionary actions to begin with under the direction of the 
social democrats; but this action soon fell into an unending series of 
local, partial, economic strikes in separate districts, towns, depart- 
ments and factories . Throughout the whole of the spring of 1 905 and 
into the middle of the summer there fermented throughout the 
whole of the immense empire an uninterrupted economic strike of 
almost the entire proletariat against capital — a struggle which 
caught on the one hand, all the petit-bourgeois and liberal professions, 
commercial employees, technicians, actors and members of artistic 
professions — and on the other hand, penetrated to the domestic 
servants, the minor police officials and even to the stratum of the 
lumpenproletariat, and simultaneously surged from the towns to the 
country districts and even knocked at the iron gates of the military 
barracks. 

This is a gigantic, many-coloured picture of a general arrange- 
ment of labour and capital which reflects all the complexity of social 
organisation and of the political consciousness of every section and 
of every district; and the whole long scale runs from the regular trade 
union struggle of a picked and tested troop of the proletariat drawn 
from large-scale industry, to the formless protest of a handful of 
rural proletarians, and to the first slight stirrings of an agitated 
military garrison, from the well-educated and elegant revolt in cuffs 
and white collars in the counting house of a bank to the shy-bold 
murmurings of a clumsy meeting of dissatisfied policemen in a 
smoke-grimed, dark and dirty guard-room. 



32 



The Mass Strike 



According to the theory of the lovers of ‘orderly and well- 
disciplined’ struggles, according to plan and scheme, according to 
those especially who always ought to know better from afar ‘how it 
should have been done’, the decay of the great political general strike 
of January 1905 into a number of economic struggles was probably ‘a 
great mistake’ which crippled that action and changed it into a ‘straw 
fire’. But social democracy in Russia, which had taken part in the 
revolution but had not ‘made’ it, and which had even to learn its law 
from its course itself, was at the first glance put out of countenance 
for a time by the apparently fruidess ebb of the stormflood of the 
general strike. History, however, which had made that ‘great mis- 
take’, thereby accomplished, heedless of the reasonings of its officious 
school-master, a gigantic work for the revolution which was, inevit- 
able as it was, in its consequences, incalculable. 

The sudden general rising of the proletariat in January under the 
powerful impetus of the St Petersburg events was outwardly a political 
act of the revolutionary declaration of war on absolutism. But this first 
general direct action reacted inwardly all the more powerfully as it 
for the first time awoke feeling and class-consciousness in millions 
upon millions as if by an electric shock. And this awakening of class 
feeling expressed itself forthwith in the circumstances that the prole- 
tarian mass, counted by millions, quite suddenly and sharply came 
to realise how intolerable was that social and economic existence 
which they had patiently endured for decades in the chains of 
capitalism. Thereupon there began a spontaneous general shaking 
of and tugging at these chains. All the innumerable sufferings of the 
modern proletariat reminded them of the old bleeding wounds. 
Here was the eight-hour day fought for, there piece-work was 
resisted, here were brutal foremen ‘driven off in a sack on a hand- 
cart, at another place infamous systems of fines were fought against, 
everywhere better wages were striven for and here and there the 
abolition of home-work. Backward degraded occupations in large 
towns, small provincial towns which had hitherto dreamed in an 
idyllic sleep, the village with its legacy from feudalism — all these, 
suddenly awakened by the January lightning, bethought themselves 
of their rights and now sought feverishly to make up for their 
previous neglect. 



Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia 



33 



The economic struggle was not here really a decay, a dissipation 
of action, but merely change of front, a sudden and natural altera- 
tion of the first general engagement with absolutism, in a general 
reckoning with capital, which in keeping with its character, assumed 
the form of individual, scattered wage struggles. Not political class 
action was broken in January by the decay of the general strike into 
economic strikes, but the reverse; after the possible content of 
political action in the given situation and at the given stage of the 
revolution was exhausted, it broke, or rather changed, into economic 
action. 

In point of fact, what more could the general strike in January 
have achieved? Only complete thoughtlessness could expect that 
absolutism could be destroyed at one blow by a single ‘long-drawn’ 
general strike after the anarchist plan. Absolutism in Russia must be 
overthrown by the proletariat. But in order to be able to overthrow it 
the proletariat requires a high degree of political education, of 
class-consciousness and organisation. All these conditions cannot be 
fulfilled by pamphlets and leaflets, but only by the living political 
school, by the fight and in the fight, in the continuous course of the 
revolution. Further: absolutism cannot be overthrown at any desired 
moment in which only adequate ‘exertion’ and ‘endurance’ are 
necessary. The fall of absolutism is merely the outer expression of 
the inner social and class development of Russian society. 

Before absolutism can, and so that it may, be overthrown, the 
bourgeois Russia in its interior, in its modem class divisions, must 
be formed. That requires the drawing together of the various social 
layers and interests, besides the edqcation of the proletarian revolu- 
tionary parties, and not less of the liberal, radical, petit-bourgeois, 
conservative and reactionary parties; it requires self-consciousness, 
self-knowledge and the class-conciousness not merely of the layers 
of the people, but also of the layers of the bourgeoisie. But this also 
can be achieved and come to fruition in no way but in the struggle, in 
the process of the revolution itself, through the actual school of 
experience, in collision with the proletariat as well as with one 
another, in incessant mutual friction. This class division and class 
maturity of bourgeois society, as well as its action in the struggle 
against absolutism, is on the one hand hampered and made difficult 



34 



The Mass Strike 



by the peculiar leading role of the proletariat, and on the other hand, 
is spurred on and accelerated. The various undercurrents of the 
social process of the revolution cross one another, check one another, 
and increase the internal contradictions of the revolution, but in the 
end accelerate and thereby render still more violent its eruptions. 

This apparently simple and purely mechanical problem may 
therefore be stated thus: the overthrow of absolutism is a long 
continuous social process, and its solution demands a complete 
undermining of the soil of society; the uppermost part be placed 
lowest and the lowermost part highest, the apparent ‘order’ must be 
changed to a chaos, and apparently ‘anarchistic’ chaos must be 
changed into a new order. Now in this process of the social trans- 
formation of the old Russia, not only the January lightning of the 
first general strike but also the spring and summer thunderstorms 
that followed it played an indispensable part. The embittered general 
relations of wage labour and capital contributed in equal measure to 
the drawing together of the various layers of the people and those of 
the bourgeoisie, to the class-consciousness of the revolutionary prole- 
tariat and to that of the liberal and conservative bourgeoisie. And 
just as the urban wage struggle contributed to the formation of a 
strong monarchist industrial party in Moscow, so the conflagration 
of the violent rural rising in Livonia led to the rapid liquidation of 
the famous aristocratic-agrarian zemstvo liberalism. 18 

But at the same time, the period of the economic struggles of 
the spring and summer of 1905 made it possible for the urban 
proletariat, by means of active social democratic agitation and direc- 
tion, to assimilate later all the lessons of the January prologue and to 
grasp clearly all the further tasks of the revolution. There was 
connected with this too, another circumstance of an enduring social 
character: a general raising of the standard of life of the proletariat, 
economic, social and intellectual. 

The January strikes of 1905 ended victoriously almost through- 
out. As proof of this, some data from the enormous, and still for the 
most part inaccessible, mass of material may be cited here relating to 
a few of the most important strikes carried through in Warsaw alone 
by the social democrats of Poland and Lithuania. 19 In the great 
factories of the metal industry of Warsaw: Lilpop Ltd, Ran and 



Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia 



35 



Lowenstein, Rudzki and Co, Borman, Schwede and Co, Handtke, 
Gerlach and Pulst, Geisler Bros, Eberherd, Wolski and Co, Konrad 
and Yarnuszkiewicz Ltd, Weber and Daehu, Ewizdzinski and Co, 
Wolonoski Wire Works, Gostynski and Co Ltd, Rrun and Son, 
Frage Norblin, Werner, Buch, Kenneberg Bros, Labor, Dittunar 
Lamp Factory, Serkowski, Weszk — twenty-two factories in all, the 
workers won, after a strike of from four to five weeks (from 25 and 26 
January), a nine-hour day, a 25 per cent increase of wages and 
obtained various smaller concessions. In the large workshops of the 
timber industry of Warsaw, namely Karmanski, Damieki, Gromel, 
Szerbinskik, Twemerowski, Horn, Devensee, Tworkowski, Daab 
and Martens — twelve workshops in all — the strikes had won by 23 
February the nine-hour day; they were not satisfied with this, but 
insisted upon the eight-hour day, which they also won, together 
with an increase of wages, after a further strike of a week. The entire 
bricklaying industry began a strike on 27 February and demanded, 
in conformity with the watchword of social democracy, the eight- 
hour day; they won the ten-hour day on 1 1 March together with an 
increase of wages for all categories, regular payment of wages weekly, 
etc. The painters, the Cartwrights, the saddlers and the smiths all won 
the eight-hour day without decrease of wages. 

The telephone workshops struck for ten days and won the 
eight-hour day and an increase of wages from 10 to 15 per cent. The 
large linen-weaving establishment of Hielle and Dietrich (10,000 
workers), after a strike lasting nine weeks, obtained a decrease of the 
working day of one hour and a wage increase of from 5 to 10 per cent. 
And similar results in endless variation were to be seen in all the 
older branches of industry in Warsaw, Lodz and Sosnovitz. 

In Russia proper, the eight-hour day was won in December 
1904 by a few categories of oil workers in Baku; in May 1905 by the 
sugar workers of the Kiev district; in January 1905 in all the printing 
works in Samara (where at the same time an increase in piece-work 
rates was obtained and fines were abolished); in February in the 
factory in which medical instruments for the army are manufactured, 
in a furniture factory and in the cartridge factory in St Petersburg. 
Further the eight-hour day was introduced in the mines at Vladi- 
vostock, in March in the government mechanical workshops dealing 



36 



The Mass Strike 



with government stock, and in May among the employees of the 
Tiflis electric town railway. In the same month a working day of 
eight-and-a-half hours was introduced in the large cotton-weaving 
factory of Morosov (and at the same time the abolition of night work 
and a wage increase of 8 per cent were won); in June an eight-hour 
day in a few oil works in St Petersburg and Moscow; in July a 
working day of eight-and-a-half hours among the smiths at the St 
Petersburg docks; and in November in all the private printing 
establishments of the town of Orel (and at the same time an increase 
of time rates of 20 per cent and piece-work rates of 100 per cent, as 
well as the setting up of a conciliation board in which workers and 
employer were equally represented). 

The nine-hour day in all the railway workshops (in February), 
in many government, military and naval workshops, in most of the 
factories of the town of Berdiansk, in all the printing works of the 
towns of Poltava and Musk; nine-and-a-half hours in the shipyards, 
mechanical workshops and foundries in the town of Nicholayev, in 
June, after a-general strike of waiters in Warsaw in many restaurants 
and cafes (and at the same time a wage increase of from 20 to 40 per 
cent, with a two-week holiday in the year). 

The ten-hour day in almost all the factories of the towns of 
Lodz, Sosnovitz, Riga, Kovno, Dorfat, Minsk, Kharkov, in the 
bakeries of Odessa, amongst the mechanics in Kishinev, at a few 
smelting works in St Petersburg, in the match factories of Kovno 
(with an increase of wages of 10 per cent), in all the government 
marine workshops, and amongst the dockers. 

The wage increases were in general smaller than the shortening 
of hours but always more significant: in Warsaw in the middle of 
March 1905 a general increase of wages of 15 per cent was fixed by 
the municipal factories department; in the centre of the textile 
industry, Ivanovo-Vosnosensk, the wage increase amounted to from 
7 to 15 per cent, in Kovno the increase affected 73 per cent of the 
workers. A fixed minimum wage was introduced in some of the bak- 
eries in Odessa, in the Neva shipbuilding yards in St Petersburg, etc. 

It goes without saying that these concessions were withdrawn 
again, now here and now there. This, however, was only the cause of 
renewed strife and led to still more bitter struggles for revenge, and 



Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia 



37 



thus the strike period of the spring of 1905 has of itself become the 
prologue to an endless series of ever-spreading and interlacing 
economic struggles which have lasted to the present day. In the 
period of the outward stagnation of the revolution, when the tele- 
graph carried no sensational news from the Russian theatre of war to 
the outside world, and when the West European laid aside his 
newspaper in disappointment with the remark that there ‘was nothing 
doing’ in Russia, the great underground work of the revolution was 
in reality being carried on without cessation, day by day and hour by 
hour, in the very heart of the empire. The incessant intensive 
economic struggle effected, by rapid and abbreviated methods, the 
transition of capitalism from the stage of primitive accumulation, of 
patriarchal unmethodical methods of working, to a highly modem, 
civilised one. 

At the present time the actual working day in Russian industry 
leaves behind, not only Russian factory legislation (that is the legal 
working day of 1 1 hours), but even the actual conditions of Germany. 
In most departments of large-scale industry in Russia the ten-hour 
day prevails, which in Germany is declared in social legislation to be 
an unattainable goal. And what is more, that longed-for ‘industrial 
constitutionalism’, for which there is so much enthusiasm in Ger- 
many, and for the sake of which the advocates of opportunist tactics 
would keep every keen wind from the stagnant waters of their 
all-suffering parliamentarism, has already been born, together with 
political ‘constitutionalism’, in the midst of the revolutionary storm, 
from the revolution itself! In actual fact it is not merely a general 
raising of the standards of life, or of the cultural level of the working 
class that has taken place. The material standard of life as a permanent 
stage of well-being, has no place in the revolution. Full of contradic- 
tions and contrasts it brings simultaneously surprising economic 
victories, and the most brutal acts of revenge on the part of the 
capitalists; today the eight-hour day, and tomorrow wholesale lock- 
outs and actual starvation for the millions. 

The most precious, because lasting, thing in this rapid ebb and 
flow of the wave is its mental sediment: the intellectual, cultural 
growth of the proletariat, which proceeds by fits and starts, and 
which offers an inviolable guarantee of their further irresistible 



38 



The Mass Strike 



progress in the economic as in the political struggle. And not only 
that. Even the relations of the worker to the employer are turned 
round; since the January general strike and the strikes of 1905 which 
followed upon it, and principle of the capitalist ‘mastery of the 
house’ is de facto abolished. In the larger factories of all important 
industrial centres the establishment of workers’ committees has, as 
if by itself, taken place, with which alone the employer negotiates 
and which decide all disputes. 

And, finally, another thing: the apparently ‘chaotic’ strikes and 
the ‘disorganised’ revolutionary action after the January general 
strike is becoming the starting point of a feverish work of organisation. 
Dame History, from afar, smilingly hoaxes the bureaucratic lay 
figures who keep grim watch at the gate over the fate of the German 
trade unions. The firm organisations, which as the indispensable 
hypothesis for an eventual German mass strike should be fortified 
like an impregnable citadel — these organisations are in Russia, on 
the contrary, already born from the mass strike. And while the 
guardians of the German trade unions for the most part fear that the 
organisations will fall in pieces in a revolutionary whirlwind like rare 
porcelain, the Russian revolution shows us the exactly opposite 
picture; from the whirlwind and the storm, out of the fire and glow 
of the mass strike and the street fighting rise again, like Venus from 
the foam, fresh, young, powerful, buoyant trade unions. 

Here again a little example, which, however, is typical of the 
whole empire. At the second conference of the Russian trade unions 
which took place at the end of February 1906 in St Petersburg, the 
representative of the Petersburg trade unions, in his report on the 
development of trade-union organisation of the czarist capital said: 

22 January 1905, which washed away the Gapon union, was a 
turning point. The workers in large numbers have learned by 
experience to appreciate and understand the importance of 
organisation, and that only they themselves can create these 
organisations. The first trade union — that of the printers — 
originated in direct connection with the January movement. 
The commission appointed to work out the tariffs framed the 
statutes, and on 19 July the union began its existence. Just 



Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia 



39 



about this time the union of office workers and book-keepers 
was called into existence. 

In addition to those organisations, which existed almost openly, 
there arose from January to October 1906 semi-legal and illegal 
trade unions. To the former belonged, for example, the union 
of chemists’ assistants and commercial employees. Amongst 
the illegal unions special attention must be drawn to the watch- 
makers’ union, whose first secret session was held on 24 April. 
All attempts to convene a general open meeting were shattered 
on the obstinate resistance of the police and the employers in 
the form of the Chamber of Commerce. This mischance has not 
prevented the existence of the union. It held secret meetings of 
members on 9 June and 14 August, apart from the sessions of 
the executive of the union. The tailors and tailoresses union was 
founded in 1905 at a meeting in a wood at which 70 tailors were 
present. After the question of forming the union was discussed 
a commission was appointed which was entrusted with the task 
of working out the statutes. All attempts of the commission to 
obtain a legal existence for the union were unsuccessful. Its 
activities were confined to agitation and the enrolling of new 
members in the individual workshops. A similar fate was in 
store for the shoemakers’ union. In July a secret night meeting 
was convened in a wood near the city. Over 100 shoemakers 
attended; a report was read on the importance of trade unionism, 
on its history in Western Europe and its tasks in Russia. It was 
then decided to form a trade union; a commission of twelve was 
appointed to work out the statutes and call a general meeting of 
shoemakers. The statutes were drawn up, but in the meantime 
it had not been found possible to print them nor had the general 
meeting been convened. 

These were the first difficult beginnings. Then came the October 
days, the second general strike, the czar’s manifesto of 30 October 
and the brief ‘constitution period’. The workers threw themselves 
with fiery zeal into the waves of political freedom in order to use it 
forthwith for the purpose of the work of organisation. Besides daily 
political meetings, debates and the formation of clubs, the develop- 



40 



The Mass Strike 



ment of trade unionism was immediately taken in hand. In October 
and November forty new trade unions appeared in St Petersburg. 
Presently a ‘central bureau’, that is a trade union council, was 
established, various trade union papers appeared, and since Novem- 
ber a central organ has also been published. The Trade Union. 

What was reported above concerning Petersburg was also true 
of the whole of Moscow and Odessa, Kiev and Nikolayev, Saratov 
and Voronezh, Samara and Nizhni-Novgorod, and all the larger 
towns of Russia, and in still higher degree of Poland. The trade 
unions of different towns seek contact with one another and confer- 
ences are held. The end of the ‘constitution period’, and the return 
to reaction in December 1905, put a stop for the time being to the 
open widespread activity of the trade unions, but did not, however, 
altogether extinguish them. They operate as organisations in secret 
and occasionally carry on quite open wage struggles. A peculiar 
mixture of the legal and illegal condition of trade union life is being 
built up, corresponding to the highly contradictory revolutionary 
situation. 

But in the midst of the struggle the work of organisation is 
being more widely extended, in a thoroughgoing, not to say pedantic 
fashion. The trade unions of the social democracy of Poland and 
Lithuania, for example, which at the last congress (in July 1906) 
were represented by five delegates from a membership of 10,000, are 
furnished with the usual statutes, printed membership cards, ad- 
hesive stamps, etc. And the same bakers and shoemakers, engineers 
and printers of Warsaw and Lodz who in June 1905 stood on the 
barricades and in December only awaited the word from Petersburg 
to begin street fighting, find time and are eager, between one mass 
strike and another, between prison and lockout, and under the 
conditions of a siege, to go into their trade union statutes and discuss 
them earnestly. These barricade fighters of yesterday and tomorrow 
have indeed more than once at meetings severely reprimanded their 
leaders and threatened them with withdrawal from the party because 
the unlucky trade union membership cards could not be printed 
quickly enough — in secret printing works under incessant police 
persecution. This zeal and this earnestness continue to this day. For 
example, in the first two weeks of July 1906, fifteen new trade 



Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia 



41 



unions appeared in Ekaterinoslav, six in Kostroma, several in Kiev, 
Poltava, Smolensk, Tscherkassy, Proskurvo, down to the most 
insignificant provincial towns. 

In the session of the Moscow trade union council of 4 June this 
year [1906], after the acceptance of the reports of individual trade 
union delegates, it was decided ‘that the trade unions should dis- 
cipline their members and restrain from street rioting because the 
time is not considered opportune for the mass strike. In the face of 
possible provocation on the part of the government, care should be 
taken that the masses do not stream out in the streets.’ Finally, the 
council decided that if at any time one trade union began a strike the 
others should hold back from any wages movement. Most of the 
economic struggles are now directed by the trade unions. 

Thus the great economic struggle which proceeded from the 
January general strike and which has not ceased to the present day, 
has formed a broad background of the revolution from which, in 
ceaseless reciprocal action with the political agitation and the exter- 
nal events of the revolution, there ever arise here and there now 
isolated explosions, and now great general actions of the proletariat. 
Thus there flame up against this background the following events 
one after the other; at the May Day demonstration there was an 
unprecedented, absolute general strike in Warsaw which ended in a 
bloody encounter between the defenceless crowd and the soldiers. 
At Lodz in June a mass outing which was scattered by the soldiers, 
led to a demonstration of 100,000 workers at the funeral of some of 
the victims of the brutal soldiery and to a renewed encounter with 
the military, and finally, on 23, 24 and 25 June, passed into the first 
barricade fight in the czarist empire. Similarly in June the first great 
revolt of the sailors of the Black Sea Fleet exploded in the harbour at 
Odessa from a trifling incident on board the armoured vessel Potemkin 
which reacted immediately on Odessa and Nikolayev in the form of a 
violent mass strike. As a further echo the mass strike and the sailors’ 
revolts followed in Kronstadt, Libau and Vladivostok. 

In the month of October the grandiose experiment of St Peters- 
burg was made with the introduction of the eight-hour day. The 
general council of workers’ delegates 20 decided to achieve the eight- 
hour day in a revolutionary manner. That means that on the ap- 



42 



The Mass Strike 



pointed day all the workers of Petersburg should inform their 
employers that they were not willing to work more than eight hours a 
day, and should leave their places of work at the end of eight hours. 
The idea was the occasion of lively agitation, was accepted by the 
proletariat with enthusiasm and carried out, but very great sacrifices 
were not thereby avoided. Thus for example, the eight-hour day 
meant an enormous fall in wages for the textile workers who had 
hitherto worked eleven hours and that on a system of piecework. 
This, however, they willingly accepted. Within a week the eight-hour 
day prevailed in every factory and workshop in Petersburg, and the joy 
of the workers knew no bounds. Soon, however, the employers, 
stupefied at first, prepared their defences; everywhere they threat- 
ened to close their factories. Some of the workers consented to 
negotiate and obtained here a working day of ten hours and there one 
of nine hours. The elite of the Petersburg proletariat, however, the 
workers in the large government engineering establishments, re- 
mained unshaken, and a lockout ensued which threw from 45 ,000 to 
50,000 men on the streets for a month. At the settlement the 
eight-hour day movement was carried into the general strike of 
December which the great lockout had hampered to a great extent. 

Meanwhile, however, the second tremendous general strike 
throughout the whole empire follows in October as a reply to the 
project of the Bulygin Duma 21 — the strike to which the railwaymen 
gave the summons. This second great action of the proletariat 
already bears a character essentially different from that of the first 
one in January. The element of political consciousness already plays 
a much bigger role. Here also, to be sure, the immediate occasion for 
the outbreak of the mass strike was a subordinate and apparently 
accidental thing: the conflict of the railwaymen with the management 
over the pension fund. But the general rising of the industrial 
proletariat which followed upon it was conducted in accordance with 
clear political ideas. The prologue of the January strike was a pro- 
cession to the czar to ask for political freedom: the watchword of the 
October strike ran away with the constitutional comedy of czarism! 

And thanks to the immediate success of the general strike, to 
the czar’s manifesto of 30 October, 22 the movement does not flow 
back on itself, as in January, but rushes over outwardly in the eager 



Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia 



43 



activity of newly acquired political freedom. Demonstrations, meet- 
ings, a young press, public discussions and bloody massacres as the 
end of the story, and thereupon new mass strikes and demonstrations 
— such is the stormy picture of the November and December days. 
In November, at the instance of the social democrats in Petersburg 
the first demonstrative mass strike is arranged as a protest demon- 
stration against the bloody deeds and the proclamation of a state of 
siege in Poland and Livonia. 

The fermentation after the brief constitutional period and the 
gruesome awakening finally leads in December to the outbreak of 
the third general mass strike throughout the empire. This time its 
course and its outcome are altogether different from those in the two 
earlier cases. Political action does not change into economic action as 
in January, but it no longer achieves a rapid victory as in October. 
The attempts of the czarist camarilla with real political freedom are 
no longer made, and revolutionary action therewith, for the first 
time, and along its whole length, knocked against the strong wall of 
the physical violence of absolutism. By the logical internal develop- 
ment of progressive experience the mass strike this time changes into 
an open insurrection, to armed barricades, and street fighting in 
Moscow. The December days in Moscow close the first eventful year 
of the revolution as the highest point in the ascending line of political 
action and of the mass strike movement. 

The Moscow events show a typical picture of the logical devel- 
opment and at the same time of the future of the revolutionary 
movement on the whole: their inevitable close in a general open 
insurrection, which again on its part cannot come in any other way 
than through the school of a series of preparatory partial insurrec- 
tions, which therefore meantime end in partial outward ‘defeats’ 
and, considered individually, may appear to be ‘premature’. 

The year 1906 brings the elections to the Duma and the Duma 
incidents. The proletariat, from a strong revolutionary instinct and 
clear knowledge of the situation, boycotts the whole czarist- 
constitutional farce; and liberalism again occupies the centre of the 
stage for a few months. The situation of 1904 appears to have come 
again, a period of speeches instead of acts, and the proletariat for a 
time walk in the shadow in order to devote themselves the more 



44 



The Mass Strike 



diligently to the trade union struggle and the work of organisation. 
The mass strikes are no longer spoken of, while the clattering 
rockets of liberal rhetoric are fired off day after day. At last the iron 
curtain is tom down, the actors are dispersed, and nothing remains 
of the liberal rockets but smoke and vapour. An attempt of the 
central committee of the Russian social democracy to call forth a 
mass strike, as a demonstration for the Duma and the re-opening of 
the period of liberal speechmaking, falls absolutely flat. The role of 
the political mass strike alone is exhausted, but at the same time, the 
transition of the mass strike into a general popular rising is not yet 
accomplished. The liberal episode is past, the proletarian episode is 
not yet begun. The stage remains empty for the time being. 



Development of the Mass Strike Movement in Russia 



45 



Chapter Four 



THE INTERACTION OF THE POLITICAL 
AND THE ECONOMIC STRUGGLE 



WE HAVE attempted in the foregoing to sketch the history of the mass 
strike in Russia in a few strokes. Even a fleeting glance at this history 
shows us a picture which in no way resembles that usually formed by 
the discussions in Germany on the mass strike. Instead of the rigid 
and hollow scheme of an arid political action carried out by the 
decision of the highest committees and furnished with a plan and 
panorama, we see a bit of pulsating life of flesh and blood, which 
cannot be cut out of the large frame of the revolution but is connected 
with all parts of the revolution by a thousand veins. 

The mass strike, as the Russian Revolution shows it to us, is 
such a changeable phenomenon that it reflects all phases of the 
political and economic struggle, all stages and factors of the revolu- 
tion. Its adaptability, its efficiency, the factors of its origin are 
constantly changing. It suddenly opens new and wide perspectives 
of the revolution when it appears to have already arrived in a narrow 
pass and where it is impossible for anyone to reckon upon it with any 
degree of certainty. It flows now like a broad billow over the whole 
kingdom, and now divides into a gigantic network of narrow streams; 
now it bubbles forth from under the ground like a fresh spring and is 
now completely lost under the earth. Political and economic strikes, 
general strikes of individual branches of industry and general strikes 
in individual towns, peaceful wage struggles and street massacres, 
barricade fighting — all these run through one another, run side by 
side, cross one another, flow in and over one another — it is a 
ceaselessly moving changing sea of phenomena. And the law of 
motion of these phenomena is clear: it does not lie in the mass strike 



46 



The Mass Strike 



itself nor in its technical details, but in the political and social 
proportions of the forces of the revolution. 

The mass strike is merely the form of the revolutionary struggle 
and every disarrangement of the relations of the contending powers, 
in party development and in class division, in the position of the 
counter-revolution — all this immediately influences the action of 
the strike in a thousand invisible and scarcely controllable ways. But 
strike action itself does not cease for a single moment. It merely 
alters its forms, its dimensions, its effect. It is the living pulse-beat of 
the revolution and at the same time its most powerful driving wheel. 
In a word, the mass strike, as shown to us in the Russian Revolution, 
is not a crafty method discovered by subde reasoning for the purposes 
of making the proletarian struggle more effective, but the method of 
motion of the proletarian mass, the phenomenal form of the proletarian 
struggle in the revolution. 

Some general aspects may now be examined which may assist 
us in forming a correct estimate of the problem of the mass strike. 

1 . It is absurd to think of the mass strike as one act, one isolated 
action . The mass strike is rather the indication, the rallying idea, of a 
whole period of the class struggle lasting for years, perhaps for 
decades. Of the innumerable and highly varied mass strikes which 
have taken place in Russia during the last four years the scheme of 
the mass strike was a purely political movement, begun and ended 
after a cut and dried plan, a short single act of the one variety only 
and that a subordinate variety — pure demonstration strike. In the 
whole course of the five-year period we see in Russia only a few 
demonstration strikes which, be it noted, were generally confined to 
single towns. Thus the annual May Day general strike in Warsaw 
and Lodz in Russia proper on the first of May has not yet been 
celebrated to any appreciable extent by abstention from work — the 
mass strike in Warsaw on 11 September 1905, as a memorial service 
in honour of the executed Martin Kasprzak, that of November 1905 
in Petersburg as protest demonstration against the declaration of a 
state of siege in Poland and Livonia; that of 22 January 1906 in 
Warsaw, Lodz, Czentochon and in the Dombrowa coal basin, as 
well as, in part, those in a few Russian towns as anniversary celebra- 
tions of the Petersburg bloodbath; in addition, in July 1906 a general 



The Interaction of the Political and the Economic Struggle 



47 



strike in Tiflis as demonstration of sympathy with soldiers sentenced 
by court-martial on account of the military revolt; and finally from 
the same cause in September 1906, during the deliberations of the 
court-martial in Reval. All the above great and partial mass strikes 
and general strikes were not demonstration strikes but fighting 
strikes, and as such they originated for the most part spontaneously 
in every case from specific local accidental causes, without plan and 
undesignedly, and grew with elemental power into great movements, 
and then they did not begin an ‘orderly retreat’, but turned now into 
economic struggles, now into street fighting, and now collapsed of 
themselves. 

In this general picture the purely political demonstration strike 
plays quite a subordinate role — isolated small points in the midst of 
a mighty expanse. Thereby, temporarily considered, the following 
characteristic discloses itself: the demonstration strikes which, in 
contradistinction to the fighting strikes, exhibit the greatest mass of 
party discipline, conscious direction and political thought and there- 
fore must appear as the highest and most mature form of the mass 
strike, play in reality the greatest part in the beginnings of the 
movement. Thus for example, the absolute cessation of work of 1 
May 1905 in Warsaw as the first instance of a decision of the social 
democrats carried throughout in such an astonishing fashion, was an 
experience of great importance for the proletarian movement in 
Poland. In the same way the sympathetic strike of the same year in 
Petersburg made a great impression as the first experiment of 
conscious systematic mass action in Russia. Similarly the ‘trial mass 
strike’ of the Hamburg comrades on 17 January 1906 will play a 
prominent part in the history of the future German mass strike as the 
first vigorous attempt with the much disputed weapon, and also a 
very successful and convincingly striking test of the fighting temper 
and the lust for battle of the Hamburg working class. And just as 
surely will the period of the mass strike in Germany, when it has 
once begun in real earnest, lead of itself to a real, general cessation of 
work on 1 May. The May Day festival may naturally be raised to a 
position of honour as the first great demonstration under the aegis of 
the mass struggle. In this sense the ‘lame horse’, as the May Day 
festival was termed at the trade-union congress at Cologne, has still a 



48 



The Mass Strike 



great future before it and an important part to play, in the proletarian 
class struggle in Germany. 

But with the development of the earnest revolutionary struggle 
the importance of such demonstrations diminishes rapidly. It is 
precisely those factors which objectively facilitate the realisation of 
the demonstration strike after a preconceived plan and at the party’s 
word of command — namely, the growth of political consciousness 
and the training of the proletariat — make this kind of mass strike 
impossible; today the proletariat in Russia, the most capable van- 
guard of the masses, does not want to know about mass strikes; the 
workers are no longer in a mood for jesting and will now think only 
of a serious struggle with all its consequences. And when, in the first 
great mass strike in January 1905, the demonstrative element, not 
indeed in an intentional, but more in an instinctive spontaneous 
form, still played a great part, on the other hand, the attempt of the 
central committee of the Russian social democrats to call a mass 
strike in August as a demonstration for the dissolved Duma, was 
shattered by, among other things, the positive disinclination of the 
educated proletariat to engage in weak half-actions and mere 
demonstrations. 

2. When, however, we have in view the less important strike of 
the demonstrative kind, instead of the fighting strikes as it represents 
in Russia today the actual vehicle of proletarian action, we see still 
more clearly that it is impossible to separate the economic and the 
political factors from one another. Here also the reality deviates from 
the theoretical scheme, and the pedantic representation in which the 
pure political mass strike is logically derived from the trade union 
general strike as the ripest and highest stage, but at the same time is 
kept distinct from it, is shown to be absolutely false. This is expressed 
not merely in the fact that the mass strikes, from that first great 
wages struggle of the Petersburg textile workers in 1896-7 to the last 
great mass strike in December 1905, passed imperceptibly from the 
economic field to the political, so that it is almost impossible to draw 
a dividing line between them. Again, every one of the great mass 
strikes repeats, so to speak, on a small scale, the entire history of the 
Russian mass strike, and begins with a pure economic, or at all 
events, a partial trade union conflict, and runs through all the stages 



The Interaction of the Political and the Economic Struggle 



49 



to the political demonstration. The great thunderstorm of mass 
strikes in South Russia in 1902 and 1903 originated, as we have seen, 
in Baku from a conflict arising from the disciplinary punishment of 
the unemployed, in Rostov from disputes about wages in the railway 
workshops, in Tiflis from a struggle of the commercial employees 
for reduction of working hours, in Odessa from a wage dispute in 
one single small factory. The January mass strike of 1905 developed 
from an internal conflict in the Putilov works, the October strike 
from the struggle of the railway workers for a pension fund, and 
finally the December strike from the struggle of the postal and 
telegraph employees for the right of combination. The progress of 
the movement on the whole is not expressed in the circumstances 
that the economic initial stage is omitted, but much more in the 
rapidity with which all the stages of the political demonstration are 
run through and in the extremity of the point to which the strike 
moves forward. 

But the movement on the whole does not proceed from the 
economic to the political struggle, nor even the reverse. Every great 
political mass action, after it has attained its highest point, breaks up 
into a mass of economic strikes. And that applies not only to each of 
the great mass strikes, but also to the revolution as a whole. With the 
spreading, clarifying and involution of the political struggle, the 
economic struggle not only does not recede, but extends, organises 
and becomes involved in equal measure. Between the two there is 
the most complete reciprocal action. 

Every new onset and every fresh victory of the political struggle 
is transformed into a powerful impetus for the economic struggle, 
extending at the same time its external possibilities and intensifying 
the inner urge of the workers to better their position, and their desire 
to struggle. After every foaming wave of political action a fructifying 
deposit remains behind from which a thousand stalks of economic 
struggle shoot forth. And conversely. The workers’ condition of 
ceaseless economic struggle with the capitalists keeps their fighting 
energy alive in every political interval; it forms, so to speak, the 
permanent fresh reservoir of the strength of the proletarian classes, 
from which the political fight ever renews its strength, and at the 
same time leads the indefatigable economic sappers of the proletariat 



50 



The Mass Strike 




at all times now here and now there, to isolated sharp conflicts, out 
of which political conflicts on a large scale unexpectedly explode. 

In a word: the economic struggle is the transmitter from one 
political centre to another; the political struggle is the periodic 
fertilisation of the soil for the economic struggle. Cause and effect 
here continually change places; and thus the economic and the 
political factor in the period of the mass strike, now widely removed, 
completely separated or even mutually exclusive as the theoretical 
plan would have them, merely form the two interlacing sides of the 
proletarian class struggle in Russia. And their unity is precisely the 
mass strike. If the sophisticated theory purposes to make a clever 
logical dissection of the mass strike for the purpose of getting at the 
‘purely political mass strike’ it will by this dissection, as with' any 
other, not perceive the phenomenon in its living essence, but will 
kill it altogether. 

3. Finally, the events in Russia show us that the mass strike is 
inseparable from the revolution. The history of the Russian mass 
strikes is the history of the Russian Revolution. When, to be sure, 
the representatives of our German opportunism hear of ‘revolution’, 
they immediately think of bloodshed, street fighting or powder and 
shot, and the logical conclusion thereof is: the mass strike leads 
inevitably to the revolution, therefore we dare not have it. In actual 
fact we see in Russia that almost every mass strike in the long run 
leads to an encounter with the armed guardians of czarist order, and 
therein the so-called political strikes exactly resemble the larger 
economic struggle. The revolution, however, is something other and 
something more than bloodshed. In contradiction to the police 
interpretation, which views the revolution exclusively from the 
standpoint of street disturbances and rioting, that is, from the 
standpoint of ‘disorder’ — the interpretation of scientific socialism 
sees in the revolution above all a thorough-going internal reversal of 
social class relations. And from this standpoint an altogether different 
connection exists between revolution and mass strike in Russia from 
that contained in the commonplace conception that the mass strike 
generally ends in bloodshed. 

We have seen above the inner mechanism of the Russian mass 
strike which depends upon the ceaseless reciprocal action of the 



The Interaction of the Political and the Economic Struggle 



SI 



political and economic struggles. But this reciprocal action is con- 
ditioned during the revolutionary period. Only in the sultry air of 
the period of revolution can any partial little conflict between labour 
and capital grow into a general explosion. In Germany the most 
violent, most brutal collisions between the workers and employers 
take place every year and every day without the struggle over- 
leaping the bound of the individual departments or individual towns 
concerned, or even those of the individual factories. Punishment of 
organised workers in Petersburg and unemployment as in Baku, 
wage struggles as in Odessa, struggles for the right of combination as 
in Moscow, are the order of the day in Germany. No single one of 
these cases, however, changes suddenly into a common class action. 
And when they grow into isolated mass strikes, which have without 
question a political colouring, they do not bring about a general 
storm. The general strike of the Dutch railwaymen, which died 
away in spite of the warmest sympathy, in the midst of the complete 
impassivity of the proletariat of the country, affords a striking proof 
of this. 

And conversely, only in the period of the revolution, when the 
social foundations and the walls of the class society are shaken and 
subjected to a constant process of disarrangement, any political class 
action of the proletariat can arouse from their passive condition in a 
few hours whole sections of the working class who have hitherto 
remained unaffected, and this is immediately and naturally expressed 
in a stormy economic struggle. The worker, suddenly aroused to 
activity by the electric shock of political action, immediately seizes 
the weapon lying nearest his hand for the fight against his condition 
of economic slavery; the stormy gesture of the political struggle 
causes him to feel with unexpected intensity the weight and the 
pressure of his economic chains. And while, for example, the most 
violent political struggle in Germany — the electoral struggle or the 
parliamentary struggle on the customs tariff — exercised a scarcely 
perceptible direct influence upon the course and the intensity of the 
wage struggles being conducted at the same time in Germany, every 
political action of the proletariat in Russia immediately expresses 
itself in the extension of the area and the deepening of the intensity 
of the economic struggle. 



52 



The Mass Strike 



The revolution thus first creates the social conditions in which 
this sudden change of the economic struggle into the political and of 
the political struggle into the economic is possible, a change which 
finds its expression in the mass strike. And if the vulgar scheme sees 
the connection between the mass strike and revolution only in 
bloody street encounters with which the mass strikes conclude, a 
somewhat deeper look into the Russian events shows an exactly 
opposite connection: in reality the mass strike does not produce the 
revolution, but the revolution produces the mass strike. 

4. It is sufficient in order to comprehend the foregoing to obtain 
an explanation of the question of the conscious direction and initiative 
in the mass strike. If the mass strike is not an isolated act but a whole 
period of the class struggle, and if this period is identical with a 
period of revolution, it is clear that the mass strike cannot be called 
at will, even when the decision to do so may come from the highest 
committee of the strongest social democratic party. As long as the 
social democracy has not the power to stage and countermand 
revolutions according to its fancy, even the greatest enthusiasm and 
impatience of the social democratic troops will not suffice to call into 
being a real period of mass strike as a living, powerful movement of 
the people. On the basis of a decision of the party leadership and of 
party discipline a single short demonstration may well be arranged 
similar to the Swedish mass strike, or to the latest Austrian strike, or 
even to the Hamburg mass strike of 17 January. These demonstra- 
tions, however, differ from an actual period of revolutionary mass 
strikes in exactly the same way that the well-known demonstrations 
in foreign ports during a period of strained diplomatic relations 
differ from a naval war. A mass strike bom of pure discipline and 
enthusiasm will, at best, merely play the role of an episode, of a 
symptom of the fighting mood of the working class upon which, 
however, the conditions of a peaceful period are reflected. 

Of course, even during the revolution mass strikes do not 
exactly fall from heaven. They must be brought about in some way 
or another by the workers. The resolution and determination of the 
workers also play a part and indeed the initiative and the wider 
direction naturally fall to the share of the organised and most en- 
lightened kernel of the proletariat. But the scope of this initiative 



The Interaction of the Political and the Economic Struggle 



S3 



and this direction, for the most part, is confined to application to 
individual acts, to individual strikes, when the revolutionary period 
is already begun, and indeed, in most cases, is confined within the 
boundaries of a single town. Thus, for example, as we have seen, the 
social democrats have already, on several occasions, successfully 
issued a direct summons for a mass strike in Baku, in Warsaw, in 
Lodz and in Petersburg. But this succeeds much less frequendy 
when applied to general movements of the whole proletariat. 

Further, there are quite definite limits set to initiative and 
conscious direction. During the revolution it is extremely difficult 
for any directing organ of the proletarian movement to foresee and to 
calculate which occasions and factors can lead to explosions and 
which cannot. Here also initiative and direction do not consist in 
issuing commands according to one’s inclinations, but in the most 
adroit adaptability to the given situation, and the closest possible 
contact with the mood of the masses. The element of spontaneity, as 
we have seen, plays a great part in all Russian mass strikes without 
exception, be it as a driving force or as a restraining influence. This 
does not occur in Russia, however, because social democracy is still 
young or weak, but because in every individual act of the struggle so 
very many important economic, political and social, general and 
local, material and physical, factors react upon one another in such a 
way that no single act can be arranged and resolved as if it were a 
mathematical problem. The revolution, even when the proletariat, 
with the social democrats at their head, appear in the leading role, is 
not a manoeuvre of the proletariat in the open field, but a fight in the 
midst of the incessant crashing, displacing and crumbling of the 
social foundation. In short, in the mass strike in Russia the element 
of spontaneity plays such a predominant part, not because the 
Russian proletariat are ‘uneducated’, but because revolutions do not 
allow anyone to play the schoolmaster with them. 

On the other hand, we see in Russia that the same revolution 
which rendered the social democrats’ command of the mass strike so 
difficult, and which struck the conductor’s baton from, or pressed it 
into, their hand at all times in such a comical fashion — we see that it 
resolved of itself all those difficulties of the mass strike which, in the 
theoretical scheme of German discussion, are regarded as the chief 



54 



The Mass Strike 



concern of the ‘directing body’: the question of ‘provisioning’, 
‘discovery of cost’, and ‘sacrifice’. It goes without saying that it does 
not resolve them in the way that they would be resolved in a quiet 
confidential discussion between the higher directing committees of 
the labour movement, the members sitting pencil in hand. The 
‘regulation’ of all these questions consists in the circumstance that 
the revolution brings such an enormous mass of people upon the 
stage that any computation or regulation of the cost of the movement, 
such as can be effected in a civil process, appears to be an altogether 
hopeless undertaking.. 

The leading organisations in Russia certainly attempt to support 
the direct victims to the best of their ability. Thus, for example, the 
brave victims of the gigantic lock-out in St Petersburg, which fol- 
lowed upon the eight-hour day campaign, were supported for weeks. 
But all these measures are, in the enormous balance of the revolution, 
but as a drop in the ocean. At the moment that a real, earnest period 
of mass strikes begins, all these ‘calculations’ of ‘cost’ become merely 
projects for exhausting the ocean with a tumbler. And it is a veritable 
ocean of frightful privations and sufferings which is brought by 
every revolution to the proletarian masses. And the solution which a 
revolutionary period makes of this apparently invincible difficulty 
consists in the circumstances that such an immense volume of mass 
idealism is simultaneously released that the masses are insensible to 
the bitterest sufferings. With the psychology of a trade unionist who 
will not stay off his work on May Day unless he is assured in advance 
of a definite amount of support in the event of his being victimised, 
neither revolution nor mass strike can be made. But in the storm of 
the revolutionary period even the proletarian is transformed from a 
provident pater familias demanding support, into a ‘revolutionary 
romanticist’, for whom even the highest good, life itself, to say 
nothing of material well-being, possesses but little in comparison 
with the ideas of the struggle. 

If, however, the direction of the mass strike, in the sense of 
command over its origin, and in the sense of the calculating and 
reckoning of the cost, is a matter of the revolutionary period itself, 
the directing of the mass strike becomes, in an altogether different 
sense, the duty of social democracy and its leading organs. Instead of 



The Interaction of the Political and the Economic Struggle 



55 



puzzling their heads with the technical side, with the mechanism, of 
the mass strike, the social democrats are called upon to assume 
political leadership in the midst of the revolutionary period. 

To give the cue for, and the direction to, the fight; so to regulate 
the tactics of the political struggle in its every phase and at its every 
moment that the entire sum of the available power of the proletariat, 
which is already released and active, will find expression in the battle 
array of the party; to see that the tactics of the social democrats are 
decided according to their resoluteness and acuteness and that they 
never fall below the level demanded by the actual relations of forces, 
but rather, rise above it — that is the most important task of the 
directing body in a period of mass strikes. And this direction changes 
of itself, to a certain extent, into technical direction. A consistent, 
resolute, progressive tactic on the part of the social democrats 
produces in the masses a feeling of security, self-confidence and 
desire for struggle; a vacillating weak tactic, based on an under- 
estimation of the proletariat, has a crippling and confusing effect 
upon the masses. In the first case mass strikes break out ‘of them- 
selves’ and ‘opportunely’; in the second case they remain ineffective 
amidst direct summonses of the directing body to mass strikes. And 
on both the Russian Revolution affords striking examples. 



56 



The Mass Strike 



Chapter Five 



LESSONS OF THE WORKING-CLASS MOVEMENT 
IN RUSSIA APPLICABLE TO GERMANY 



LET US now see how far all these lessons which can be learned from 
the Russian mass strikes are applicable to Germany. The social and 
political conditions, the history and status of the labour movement, 
are widely different in Germany and Russia. At first sight the inner 
law of the Russian mass strikes as sketched above may appear to be 
solely the product of specifically Russian conditions which need not 
be taken into account by the German proletariat. Between the 
political and the economic struggle in the Russian Revolution there 
is a very close internal connection; their unity becomes an actual fact 
in the period of mass strikes. But is not that simply a result of 
Russian absolutism? In a state in which every form and expression of 
the labour movement is forbidden, in which the simplest strike is a 
political crime, it must logically follow that every economic struggle 
will become a political one. 

Further, when, contrariwise, the first outbreak of the political 
revolution has drawn after it a general reckoning of the Russian 
working class with their employers, that is likewise a simple result of 
the circumstances that the Russian worker has hitherto had a very 
low standard of life, and has never yet engaged in a single economic 
struggle for and improvement of his condition. The proletariat in 
Russia has first, to a certain extent, to work their way out of these 
miserable conditions, and what wonder that they eagerly availed 
themselves, with the eagerness of youth, of the first means to that 
end as soon as the revolution brought the first fresh breeze into the 
heavy air of absolutism? And finally, the stormy revolutionary course 
of the Russian mass strikes as well as their preponderant spontaneous, 



Lessons of Russia Applicable to Germany 



57 



elementary character is explained on the one hand by the political 
backwardness of Russia, by the necessity of first overthrowing the 
oriental despotism, and on the other hand, by the want of organisation 
and of discipline of the Russian proletariat. In a country in which the 
working class has had thirty years’ experience of political life, a 
strong social democratic party of three million members and a 
quarter of a million picked troops organised in trade unions, neither 
the political struggle nor the mass strike can possibly assume the 
same stormy and elementary character as in a semi-barbarous state 
which has just made the leap from the Middle Ages into the modern 
bourgeois order. This is the current conception amongst those who 
would read the stage of maturity of the social conditions of a country 
from the text of the written laws. 

Let us examine the questions in their order. To begin with it is 
going the wrong way about the matter to date the beginning of the 
economic struggle in Russia only from the outbreak of the revolu- 
tion. As a matter of fact, the strikes and wage disputes in Russia 
proper were increasingly the order of the day since the nineties of the 
last century, and in Russian Poland even since the eighties, and had 
eventually won civic rights for the workers. Of course they were 
frequently followed by brutal police measures, but nevertheless they 
were daily phenomena. For example, in both Warsaw and Lodz as 
early as 1891 , there was a considerable strike fund, and the enthusi- 
asm for trade unionism in these years had even created that ‘economic’ 
illusion in Poland for a short time which a few years later prevailed in 
Petersburg and the rest of Russia. 

In the same way there is a great deal of exaggeration in the 
notion that the proletarian in the czarist empire had the standard of 
life of a pauper before the revolution. The layer of the workers in 
large industries in the great towns who had been the most active and 
jealous in the economic as in the political struggle are, as regards the 
material conditions of life, on a scarcely lower plane than the cor- 
responding layer of the German proletariat, and in some occupations 
as high wages are to be met with in Russia as in Germany, and here 
and there, even higher. And as regards the length of the working 
day, the difference in the large-scale industries in the two countries 
is here and there insignificant. The notion of the presumed material 



58 



The Mass Strike 



and cultural condition of helotry [slavery] of the Russian working 
class is similarly without justification in fact. This notion is contra- 
dicted, as a little reflection will show, by the facts of the revolution 
itself and the prominent part that was played therein by the prole- 
tariat. With paupers no revolution of this political maturity and 
cleverness of thought can be made, and the industrial workers of St 
Petersburg and Warsaw, Moscow and Odessa, who stand in the 
forefront of the struggle, are culturally and mentally much nearer to 
the west European type than is imagined by those who regard 
bourgeois parliamentarism and methodical trade union practice as 
the indispensable, or even the only, school of culture for the proletar- 
iat. The modern'large capitalist development of Russia and the intel- 
lectual influence, exerted for a decade and a half, of social democracy, 
which has encouraged and directed the economic struggle, have 
accomplished an important piece of cultural work without the out- 
ward guarantees of the bourgeois legal order. 

The contrast, however, grows less when, on the other hand, we 
look a little further into the actual standard of life of the German 
working class. The great political mass strikes in Russia have from 
the first aroused the widest layers of the proletariat and thrown them 
into a feverish economic struggle. But are there not in Germany 
whole unenlightened sections amongst the workers to which the 
warm light of the trade unions has hitherto scarcely penetrated, 
whole layers which up to the present have never attempted, or vainly 
attempted, to raise themselves out of their social helotry by means of 
daily wage struggles? 

Let us consider the poverty of the miners. Already in the quiet 
working day, in the cold atmosphere of the parliamentary monotony 
of Germany — as also in other countries, and even in the El Dorado 
of trade unionism, Great Britain — the wage struggle of the mine 
workers hardly ever expresses itself in any other way than by violent 
eruptions from time to time, in mass strikes of typical, elemental 
character. This only shows that the antagonism between labour and 
capital is too sharp and violent to allow of its crumbling away in the 
form of quiet systematic, partial trade union struggles. The misery 
of the miners, with its eruptive soil which even in ‘normal’ times is a 
storm-centre of the greatest violence, must immediately explode, in 



Lessons of Russia Applicable to Germany 



59 



a violent economic socialist struggle, with every great political mass 
action of the working class, with every violent sudden jerk which 
disturbs the momentary equilibrium of everyday social life. 

Let us take further, the case of the poverty of the textile workers. 
Here also the bitter, and for the most part fruitless, outbreaks of the 
wage struggle, which raged through Vogtland every few years, give 
but a faint idea of the vehemence with which the great agglomerate 
mass of helots of trustified textile capital must explode dining a 
political convulsion, during a powerful, daring mass action of the 
German proletariat. Again let us take the poverty of the home-workers, 
of the ready-made clothing workers, of the electricity workers, veritable 
storm-centres in which violent economic struggles will be the more 
certain to break out with every political atmospheric disturbance in 
Germany, the less frequently the proletariat take up the struggle in 
tranquil times; and the more unsuccessfully they fight at any time, 
the more brutally will capital compel them to return, gnashing their 
teeth, to the yoke of slavery. 

Now, however, whole great categories of the proletariat have to 
be taken into account which, in the ‘normal’ course of things in 
Germany, cannot possibly take part in a peaceful economic struggle 
for the improvement of their condition and cannot possibly avail 
themselves of the right of combination. First and foremost we give 
the example of the glaring poverty of the railway and the postal 
employees. For these government workers there exist Russian con- 
ditions in the midst of the parliamentary constitutional state of 
Germany, that is to say, Russian conditions as they existed only 
before the revolution, during the untroubled splendour of absolut- 
ism. Already in the great October strike of 1905 the Russian railway- 
men in the then formally absolutist Russia, were, as regards the 
economic and social freedom of their movement, head and shoulders 
above the Germans. The Russian railway and postal employees won 
the de facto right of combination in the storm, and if momentarily 
trial upon trial and victimisation were the rule, they were powerless 
to affect the inner unity of the workers. 

However, it would be an altogether false psychological reckon- 
ing if one were to assume, with the German reaction, that the slavish 
obedience of the German railway and postal employees will last for 



60 



The Mass Strike 



ever, that is is a rock which nothing can wear away. When even the 
German trade union leaders have become accustomed to the existing 
conditions to such an extent that they, untroubled by an indifference 
almost without parallel in the whole of Europe, can survey with 
complete satisfaction the results of the trade union struggle in Ger- 
many, then the deep-seated, long-suppressed resentment of the uni- 
formed state slaves will inevitably find vent with a general rising of the 
industrial workers. And when the industrial vanguard of the proletar- 
iat, by means of mass strikes, grasp at new political rights or attempt to 
defend existing ones, the great army of railway and postal employees 
must of necessity bethink themselves of their own special disgrace, 
and at last rouse themselves for their liberation from the extra share of 
Russian absolutism which is specially reserved for them in Germany. 

The pedantic conception which would unfold great popular 
movements according to plan and recipe regards the acquisition of 
the right of combination for the railway workers as necessary before 
anyone will ‘dare to think’ of a mass strike in Germany. The actual 
and natural course of events can only be the opposite of this: only 
from a spontaneous powerful mass strike action can the right of 
combination for the German railway workers, as well as for the 
postal employees, actually be born. And the problems which in the 
existing conditions of Germany are insoluble will suddenly find their 
solution under the influence and the pressure of a universal political 
mass action of the proletariat. 

And finally, the greatest and most important: the poverty of the 
land workers. If the British trade unions are composed exclusively of 
industrial workers, that is quite understandable in view of the 
specific character of the British national economy, and of the un- 
important part that agriculture plays, on the whole, in the economic 
life of Britain. In Germany, a trade-union organisation, be it ever so 
well constructed, if it comprises only industrial workers, and is 
inaccessible to the great army of land workers, will give only a weak, 
partial picture of the conditions of the proletariat. But again it would 
be a fatal illusion to think that conditions in the country are unalter- 
able and immovable and that the indefatigable educational work of 
the social democrats, and still more, the whole internal class politics 
of Germany, does not continually undermine the outward passivity 



Lessons of Russia Applicable to Germany 



61 



of the agricultural workers and that any great general class action of 
the German proletariat, for whatever object undertaken, may not 
also draw the rural proletariat into the conflict. 

Similarly, the picture of the alleged economic superiority of the 
German over the Russian proletariat is considerably altered when we 
look away from the tables of the industries and departments organised 
in trade unions and bestow a look upon those great groups of the 
proletariat who are altogether outside the trade union struggle, or 
whose special economic condition does not allow of their being 
forced into the narrow framework of the daily guerrilla warfare of 
the trade unions. We see there one important sphere after another, 
in which the sharpening of antagonisms has reached the extreme 
point, in which inflammable material in abundance is heaped up, in 
which there is a great deal of ‘Russian absolutism’ in its most naked 
form and in which economically the most elementary reckonings 
with capital have first to be made. 

In a general political mass strike of the proletariat, then, all 
these outstanding accounts would inevitably be presented to the 
prevailing system. An artificially arranged demonstration of the 
urban proletariat, taking place once, a mere mass strike action 
arising out of discipline, and directed by the conductor’s baton of a 
party executive, could therefore leave the broad masses of the people 
cold and indifferent. But a powerful and reckless fighting action of 
the industrial proletariat, born of a revolutionary situation, must 
surely react upon the deeper-lying layers, and ultimately draw all 
those into a stormy general economic struggle who, in normal times, 
stand aside from the daily trade union fight. 

But when we come back to the organised vanguard of the German 
industrial proletariat on the other hand, and keep before our eyes the 
objects of the economic struggle which have been striven for by the 
Russian working class, we do not at all find that there is any 
tendency to look down upon the things of youth, as the oldest 
German trade unions had reason to do. Thus the most important 
general demand of the Russian strikes since 22 January — the 
eight-hour day — is certainly not an unattainable platform for the 
German proletariat, but rather in most cases, a beautiful, remote 
ideal. This applies also to the struggle for the ‘mastery of the 



62 



The Mass Strike 



household’ platform, to the struggle for the introduction of workers’ 
committees into all the factories, for the abolition of piecework, for 
the abolition of homework in handicraft, for the complete observance 
of Sunday rest and for the recognition of the right of combination. 
Yes, on closer inspection all the economic objects of struggle of the 
Russian proletariat are also for the German proletariat very real, and 
touch a very sore spot in the life of the workers. 

It therefore inevitably follows that the pure political mass strike, 
which is operated with for preference, is, in Germany, a mere lifeless 
theoretical plan. If the mass strikes result in a natural way from a 
strong revolutionary ferment, in a determined political struggle of 
the urban workers, they will equally, naturally, exactly as in Russia, 
change into a whole period of elementary, economic struggles. The 
fears of the trade union leaders, therefore, that the struggle for 
economic interests in a period of stormy political strife, in a period of 
mass strikes, can simply be pushed aside and suppressed, rest upon 
an utterly baseless, schoolboy conception of the course of events. A 
revolutionary period in Germany would so alter the character of the 
trade union struggle and develop its potentialities to such an extent 
that the present guerrilla warfare of the trade unions would be 
child’s play in comparison. And on the other hand, from this elemen- 
tary economic temper of mass strikes, the political struggle would 
derive always new impetus and fresh strength. The reciprocal action 
of economic and political struggle, which is the mainspring of 
present-day strikes in Russia, and at the same time the regulating 
mechanism, so to speak, of the revolutionary action of the proletariat, 
would result also in Germany, and quite as naturally, from the 
conditions themselves. 



Lessons of Russia applicable to Germany 



63 



Chapter Six 

CO-OPERATION OF ORGANISED AND UNORGANISED 
WORKERS NECESSARY FOR VICTORY 



IN CONNECTION with this, the question of organisation in relation to 
the problem of the mass strike in Germany assumes an essentially 
different aspect. 

The attitude of many trade union leaders to this question is 
generally summed up in the assertion: ‘We are not yet strong eno u gh 
to risk such a hazardous trial of strength as a mass strike.’ Now this 
position is so far untenable that it is an insoluble problem to deter- 
mine the time, in a peaceful fashion by counting heads, when the 
proletariat are ‘strong enough’ for any struggle. Thirty years ago the 
German trade unions had 50,000 members. That was obviously a 
number with which a mass strike on the above scale was not to be 
thought of. Fifteen years later the trade unions were four times as 
strong, and counted 237,000 members. If, however, the present 
trade union leaders had been asked at the time if the organisation of 
the proletariat was then sufficiently ripe for a mass strike, they 
would assuredly have replied that it was still far from it and that the 
number of those organised in trade unions would first have to be 
counted by millions. 

Today the number of trade unionists already runs into the 
second million, but the views of the leaders are still exactly the same, 
and may very well be the same to the end. The tacit assumption is 
that the entire working class of Germany, down to the last man and 
the last woman, must be included in the organisation before it is 
‘strong enough’ to risk a mass action, which then, according to the 
old formula, would probably be represented as ‘superfluous’. This 
theory is nevertheless absolutely utopian, for the simple reason that 



64 



The Mass Strike 



it suffers from an internal contradiction, that it goes in a vicious 
circle. Before the workers can engage in any direct class struggle 
they must all be organised. The circumstances, the conditions, of 
capitalist development and of the bourgeois state, make it impossible 
that, in the normal course of things, without stormy class struggles, 
certain sections — and these the greatest, the most important, the 
lowest and the most oppressed by capital, and by the state — can be 
organised at all. We see even in Britain, which has had a whole 
century of indefatigable trade union effort without any ‘disturbances’ 
— except at the beginning in the period of the Chartist movement — 
without any ‘romantic revolutionary’ errors or temptations, it has 
not been possible to do more than organise a minority of the better- 
paid sections of the proletariat. 

On the other hand the trade unions, like all fighting organisations 
of the proletariat, cannot permanently maintain themselves in any 
other way than by struggle, and that not struggles of the same kind as 
the war between the frogs and the mice in the stagnant waters of the 
bourgeois parliamentary period, but struggle in the troubled revolu- 
tionary periods of the mass strike. The rigid, mechanical-bureaucratic 
conception cannot conceive of the struggle save as the product of 
organisation at a certain stage of its strength. On the contrary the 
living, dialectical explanation makes the organisation arise as a 
product of the struggle. We have already seen a grandiose example 
of this phenomenon in Russia, where a proletariat almost wholly 
unorganised created a comprehensive network of organisational 
appendages in a year and a half of stormy revolutionary struggle. 

Another example of this kind is furnished by the history of the 
German unions. In the year 1878 the number of trade union members 
amounted to 50,000. According to the theory of the present-day 
trade union leaders this organisation, as stated above, was not nearly 
‘strong enough’ to enter upon a violent political struggle. The 
German trade unions, however, weak as they were at the time, did 
take up the struggle — namely the struggle against the anti-socialist 
law 23 — and showed that they were ‘strong enough’, not only to 
emerge victorious from the struggle, but to increase their strength 
five-fold; in 1891, after the repeal of the anti-socialist laws, their 
membership was 277,659. It is true that the methods by which the 



Co-operation Necessary for Victory 



65 



I rude unions conquered in the struggle against the anti-socialist laws 
do not correspond to the ideal of a peaceful, bee-like, uninterrupted 
process: they first went into the fight absolutely in ruins, to rise 
again on the next wave and to be born anew. But this is precisely the 
specific method of growth corresponding to the proletarian class 
organisations: to be tested in the struggle and to go forth from the 
struggle with increased strength. 

On a closer examination of German conditions and of the 
condition of the different sections of the working class, it is clear that 
the coming period of stormy political mass struggles will not bring 
the dreaded, threatening downfall of the German trade unions, but 
on the contrary, will open up hitherto unsuspected prospects of the 
extension of their sphere of power — an extension that will proceed 
rapidly by leaps and bounds. But the question has still another 
aspect. The plan of undertaking mass strikes as a serious political 
class action with organised workers only is absolutely hopeless. If 
the mass strike, or rather, mass strikes, and the mass stru ggle are to 
be successful they must become a real people’s movement, that is the 
widest sections of the proletariat must be drawn into the fight. 
Already in the parliamentary form the might of the proletarian class 
struggle rests not on the small organised group, but on the surround- 
ing periphery of the revolutionary-minded proletariat. If the social 
democrats were to enter the electoral batde with their few hundred 
thousand organised members alone they would condemn themselves 
to futility. And although it is the tendency of social democracy 
wherever possible to draw the whole great army of its voters into the 
party organisation, its mass of voters after thirty years’ experience of 
social democracy is not increased through the growth of party 
organisation but on the contrary, the new sections of the proletariat, 
won for the time being through the electoral struggle, are the fertile 
soil for the subsequent seed of organisation. Here the organisation 
does not supply the troops for the struggle, but the struggle, in an 
ever growing degree, supplies recruits for the organisation. 

In a much greater degree does this obviously apply to direct 
political mass action than to the parliamentary struggle. If the social 
democrats, as the organised nucleus of the working class, are the 
most important vanguard of the entire body of the workers and if the 



66 



The Mass Strike 



political clarity, the strength, and the unity of the labour movement 
flow from this organisation, then it is not permissible to visualise the 
class movement of the proletariat as a movement of the organised 
minority. Every real, great class struggle must rest upon the support 
and co-operation of the widest masses, and a strategy of class struggle 
which does not reckon with this co-operation, which is based upon 
the idea of the finely stage-managed march out of the small well- 
trained part of the proletariat, is fore-doomed to be a miserable 
fiasco. 

Mass strikes, and political mass struggles cannot, therefore, 
possibly be carried through in Germany by the organised workers 
alone, nor can they be appraised by regular ‘direction’ from the 
central committee of a party. In this case, again — exactly as in 
Russia — they depend not so much upon ‘discipline’ and ‘training’ 
and upon the most careful possible regulation beforehand of the 
questions of support and cost, as upon a real revolutionary, deter- 
mined class action, which will be able to win and draw into the 
struggle the widest circles of the unorganised workers, according to 
their mood and their conditions. 

The overestimate and the false estimate of the role of organisa- 
tions in the class struggle of the proletariat is generally reinforced by 
the underestimate of the unorganised proletarian mass and of their 
political maturity. In a revolutionary period, in the storm of great 
unsettling class struggles, the whole educational effect of the rapid 
capitalist development and of social democratic influences first shows 
itself upon the widest sections of the people, of which, in peaceful 
times the tables of the organised, and even election statistics, give only 
a faint idea. 

We have seen that in Russia, in about two years a great general 
action of the proletariat can forthwith arise from the smallest partial 
conflict of the workers with the employers, from the most insignific- 
ant act of brutality of the government organs. Everyone, of course, 
sees and believes that, because in Russia ‘the revolution’ is there. 
But what does that mean? It means that class feeling, the class 
instinct, is alive and very active in the Russian proletariat, so that 
immediately they regard every partial question of any small group of 
workers as a general question, as a class affair, and quick as lightning 



Co-operation Necessary for Victory 



67 



they react to its influence as a unity. While in Germany, France, 
Italy and Holland the most violent trade union conflicts call forth 
hardly any general action of the working class — and when they do, 
only the organised part of the workers moves — in Russia the 
smallest dispute raises a storm. That means nothing else, however, 
than that at present — paradoxical as it may sound — the class 
instinct of the youngest, least trained, badly educated and still worse 
organised Russian proletariat is immeasurably stronger than that of 
the organised, trained and enlightened working class of Germany or 
of any other West European country. And that is not to be reckoned 
a special virtue of the ‘young, unexhausted East’ as compared with 
the ‘sluggish West’, but is simply a result of direct revolutionary 
mass action. 

In the case of the enlightened German worker the class- 
consciousness implanted by the social democrats is theoretical and 
latent', in the period ruled by bourgeois parliamentarism it cannot, as 
a rule, actively participate in a direct mass action; it is the ideal s um 
of the four hundred parallel actions of the electoral sphere during the 
election struggle, of the many partial economic strikes and the like. 
In the revolution when the masses themselves appear upon the 
political battlefield this class-consciousness becomes practical and 
active. A year of revolution has therefore given the Russian proletariat 
that ‘training’ which thirty years of parliamentary and trade union 
struggle cannot artificially give to the German proletariat. Of course, 
this living, active class feeling of the proletariat will considerably 
diminish in intensity, or rather change into a concealed and latent 
condition, after the close of the period of revolution and the erection 
of a bourgeois-parliamentary constitutional state. 

And just as surely, on the other hand, will the living revolution- 
ary class feeling, capable of action, affect the widest and deepest 
layers of the proletariat in Germany in a period of strong political 
engagement, and that the more rapidly and more deeply, the more 
energetically the educational work of social democracy is carried on 
amongst them. This educational work and the provocative and 
revolutionising effect of the whole present policy of Germany will 
express itself in the circumstances that all those groups which at 
present in their apparent political stupidity remain insensitive to all 



68 



The Mass Strike 



the organising attempts of the social democrats and of the trade 
unions will suddenly follow the flag of social democracy in a serious 
revolutionary period. Six months of a revolutionary period will 
complete the work of the training of these as yet unorganised masses 
which ten years of public demonstrations and distribution of leaflets 
would be unable to do. And when conditions in Germany have 
reached the critical stage for such a period, the sections which are 
today unorganised and backward will, in the struggle, prove them- 
selves the most radical, the most impetuous element, and not one 
that will have to be dragged along. If it should come to mass strikes 
in Germany, it will almost certainly not be the best organised 
workers — and most certainly not the printers — who will develop 
the capacity for action, but the worst organised or totally unorganised 
— the miners, the textile workers, and perhaps even the land 
workers. 

In this way we arrive at the same conclusions in Germany in 
relation to peculiar tasks of direction, in relation to the role of social 
democracy in mass strikes, as in our analysis of events in Russia. If 
we now leave the pedantic scheme of demonstrative mass strikes 
artificially brought about by order of parties and trade unions, and 
turn to the living picture of a peoples’ movement arising with 
elementary energy, from the culmination of class antagonisms and 
the political situation — a movement which passes, politically as well 
as economically, into mass struggles and mass strikes — it becomes 
obvious that the task of social democracy does not consist in technical 
preparation and direction of mass strikes, but, first and foremost, in 
the political leadership of the whole movement. 

The social democrats are the most enlightened, most class- 
conscious vanguard of the proletariat. They cannot and dare not 
wait, in a fatalist fashion, with folded arms for the advent of the 
‘revolutionary situation’, to wait for that which, in every spontaneous 
peoples’ movement, falls from the clouds. On the contrary, they 
must now, as always, hasten the development of things and endeavour 
to accelerate events. This they cannot do, however, by suddenly 
issuing the ‘slogan’ for a mass strike at random any odd moment, but 
first and foremost, by making clear to the widest layers of the 
proletariat the inevitable advent of this revolutionary period, the 



Co-operation Necessary for Victory 



69 



inner social factors making for it and the political consequences of it. If 
I he widest proletarian layer should be won for a political mass action 
ol the social democrats, and if vice-versa, the social democrats 
should seize and maintain the real leadership of a mass movement — 
should they become, in a political sense, the rulers of the whole 
movement, then they must, with the utmost clearness, consistency 
and resoluteness, inform the German proletariat of their tactics and 
aims in the period of coming struggle. 



70 



The Mass Strike 



Chapter Seven 



THE ROLE OF THE MASS STRIKE IN THE REVOLUTION 



WE HAVE seen that the mass strike in Russia does not represent an 
artificial product of premeditated tactics on the part of the social 
democrats, but a natural historical phenomenon on the basis of the 
present revolution. Now what are the factors which in Russia have 
brought forth this new phenomenal form of the revolution? 

The Russian Revolution has for its next task the abolition of 
absolutism and the creation of a modem bourgeois-parliamentary 
constitutional state. It is exactly the same in form as that which 
confronted Germany at the March Revolution [of 1848], and France 
at the Great Revolution at the end of the eighteenth century. But the 
condition, the historical milieu, in which these formally analogous 
revolutions took place, are fundamentally different from those of 
present-day Russia. The most decisive difference is the circumstance 
that between those bourgeois revolutions of the West and the present 
bourgeois revolution in the East, the whole cycle of capitalist devel- 
opment has ran its course. And this development had seized not 
only the West European countries, but also absolutist Russia. 
Large-scale industry with all its consequences — modern class 
divisions, sharp social contrasts, modern life in large cities and the 
modern proletariat — has become in Russia the prevailing form, 
that is, in social development the decisive form of production. 

The remarkable, contradictory, historical situation results from 
this that the bourgeois revolution, in accordance with its formal 
tasks will, in the first place, be carried out by a modem class- 
conscious proletariat, and in an international milieu whose distin- 
guishing characteristic is the rain of bourgeois democracy. It is not 



The Role of the Mass Strike in the Revolution 



71 



the bourgeoisie that is now the leading revolutionary element as in 
the earlier revolutions of the West, while the proletarian masses, 
disorganised amongst the petit-bourgeoisie, furnishes material for 
the army of the bourgeoisie, but on the contrary, it is the class- 
conscious proletariat that is the leading and driving element, while 
the big-bourgeois sections are partly directly counter-revolutionary, 
partly weakly liberal, and only the rural petit-bourgeoisie and the 
urban petit-bourgeois intelligentsia are definitely oppositional and 
even revolutionary minded. 

The Russian proletariat, however, who are destined to play the 
leading part in the bourgeois revolution, enters the fight free from all 
illusions of bourgeois democracy, with a strongly developed con- 
sciousness of their own specific class interests, and at a time when 
the antagonism between capital and labour has reached its height. 
This contradictory situation finds expression in the fact that in this 
formally bourgeois revolution, the antagonism of the bourgeois 
society to absolutism is governed by the antagonism of the proletariat 
to bourgeois society, that the struggle of the proletariat is directed 
simultaneously and with equal energy against both absolutism and 
capitalist exploitation, and that the programme of the revolutionary 
struggle concentrates with equal emphasis on political freedom, the 
winning of the eight-hour day, and a human standard of material 
existence for the proletariat. This two-fold character of the Russian 
Revolution is expressed in that close union of the economic with the 
political struggle and in their mutual interaction, which we have 
seen is a feature of the Russian events and which finds its appropriate 
expression in the mass strike. 

In the earlier bourgeois revolutions, where on the one hand, the 
political training and the leadership of the revolutionary masses were 
undertaken by the bourgeois parties, and where on the other hand, 
it was merely a question of overthrowing the old government, the 
brief battle at the barricades was the appropriate form of the revolu- 
tionary struggle. Today, when the working classes are being enlight- 
ened in the course of the revolutionary struggle, when they must 
marshal their forces and lead themselves, and when the revolution is 
directed as much against the old state power as against capitalist 
exploitation, the mass strike appears as the natural means of recruit- 



72 



The Mass Strike 



ing the widest proletarian layers for the struggle, as well as being at 
the same time a means of undermining and overthrowing the old 
state power and of stemming capitalist exploitation. The urban 
industrial proletariat is now the soul of the revolution in Russia. But 
in order to carry through a direct political struggle as a mass, the 
proletariat must first be assembled as a mass, and for this purpose 
they must come out of factory and workshop, mine and foundry, 
must overcome the fragmentation and the decay to which they are 
condemned under the daily yoke of capitalism. 

The mass strike is the first natural, impulsive form of every 
great revolutionary struggle of the proletariat and the more highl y 
developed the antagonism is between capital and labour, the more 
effective and decisive must mass strikes become. The chief form of 
previous bourgeois revolutions, the fight at the barricades, the open 
conflict with the armed power of the state, is in the revolution of 
today only the culminating point, only a moment in the process of 
the proletarian mass struggle. And therewith in the new form of the 
revolution there is reached that civilising and mitigating of the class 
struggle which was prophesied by the opportunists of German social 
democracy — the Bernsteins, Davids, etc. It is true that these men 
saw the desired civilising and mitigating of the class struggle in the 
light of petit-bourgeois-democratic illusions — they believed that 
the class struggle would shrink to an exclusively parliamentary contest 
and that street fighting would simply be done away with. History has 
found the solution in a deeper and finer fashion: in the advent of 
revolutionary mass strikes, which, of course, in no way replaces 
brutal street fights or renders them unnecessary, but which reduces 
them to a moment in the long period of political struggle, and which 
at the same time unites with the revolutionary period an enormous 
cultural work in the most exact sense of the words: the material and 
intellectual elevation of the whole working class through the ‘civilis- 
ing’ of the barbaric forms of capitalist exploitation. 

The mass strike is thus shown to be not a specifically Russian 
product, springing from absolutism, but a universal form of the 
proletarian class struggle resulting from the present stage of capital- 
ist development and class relations. From this standpoint the three 
bourgeois revolutions — the Great French Revolution, the German 



The Role of the Mass Strike in the Revolution 



73 



Revolution of March, and the present Russian Revolution — form a 
continuous chain of development in which the fortunes and the end 
of the capitalist century are to be seen. In the Great French Revolution 
the still wholly underdeveloped internal contradictions of bourgeois 
society gave scope for a long period of violent struggles, in which all 
the antagonisms which first germinated and ripened in the heat of 
the revolution raged unhindered and unrestrained in a spirit of 
reckless radicalism. Half a century later the revolution of the German 
bourgeoisie, which broke out midway in the development of capital- 
ism, was already hampered on both sides by the antagonism of 
interests and the equilibrium of strength between capital and labour, 
and was smothered in a bourgeois feudal compromise, and shortened 
to a brief miserable episode ending in words. 

Another half century, and the present Russian Revolution 
stands at a point of the historical path which is already over the 
summit, which is on the other side of the culminating point of 
capitalist society, at which the bourgeois revolution cannot again be 
smothered by the antagonism between bourgeoisie and proletariat, 
but, will, on the contrary, expand into a new lengthy period of 
violent social struggles, at which the balancing of the account with 
absolutism appears a trifle in comparison with the many new accounts 
which the revolution itself opens up. The present revolution realises 
in the particular affairs of absolutist Russia the general results of 
international capitalist development, and appears not so much as the 
last successor of the old bourgeois revolutions as the forerunner of 
the new series of proletarian revolutions of the West. The most 
backward country of all, just because it has been so unpardonably 
late with its bourgeois revolution, shows ways and methods of 
further class struggle to the proletariat of Germany and the most 
advanced capitalist countries. 

Accordingly it appears, when looked at in this way, to be entirely 
wrong to regard the Russian Revolution as a fine play, as something 
specifically ‘Russian’, and at best to admire the heroism of the 
fighting men, that is, the last accessories of the struggle. It is much 
more important that the German workers should learn to look upon 
the Russian Revolution as their own affair, not merely as a matter of 
international solidarity with the Russian proletariat, but first and 



74 



The Mass Strike 



foremost, as a chapter of their ovm social and political history. Those 
trade union leaders and parliamentarians who regard the German 
proletariat as ‘too weak’ and German conditions as ‘not ripe enough’ 
for revolutionary mass struggles, have obviously not the least idea 
that the measure of the degree of ripeness of class relations in Germany 
and of the power of the proletariat does not he in the statistics of 
German trade unionism or in election figures, but — in the events of 
the Russian Revolution. Exactly as the ripeness of French class 
antagonisms under the July monarchy and the June batde of Paris was 
reflected in the German March Revolution [of 1848], in its course 
and its fiasco, so today the ripeness of German class antagonisms is 
reflected in the events and in the power of the Russian Revolution. 
And while the bureaucrats of the German labour movement rummage 
in their office drawers for information as to their strength and 
maturity, they do not see that for which they seek is lying before 
their eyes in a great historical revolution, because, historically con- 
sidered, the Russian Revolution is a reflex of the power and the 
maturity of the international, and therefore in the first place, of the 
German labour movement. 

It would therefore be a too pitiable and grotesquely insignificant 
result of the Russian Revolution if the German proletariat should 
merely draw from it the lesson — as is desired by Comrades Frohme, 
Elm, and others — of using the extreme form of the struggle, the 
mass strike, and so weaken themselves as to be merely a reserve force 
in the event of the withdrawal of the parliamentary vote, and there- 
fore a passive means of parliamentary defensive. When the parlia- 
mentary vote is taken from us there we will resist. That is a self- 
evident decision. But for this it is not necessary to adopt the heroic 
pose of a Danton as was done, for example, by Comrade Elm in Jena; 
because the defence of the modest measure of parliamentary right 
already possessed is less a heaven-storming innovation, for which 
the frightful public sacrifices of the Russian Revolution were first 
necessary as a means of encouragement, than the simplest and first 
duty of every opposition party. But the mere defensive can never 
exhaust the policy of the proletariat, in a period of revolution. And if 
it is, on the one hand, difficult to predict with any degree of certainty 
whether the destruction of universal suffrage would cause a situation 



The Role of the Mass Strike in the Revolution 



75 



in Germany which would call forth an immediate mass strike action, 
so on the other hand it is absolutely certain that when we in Germany 
enter upon the period of stormy mass actions, it will be impossible 
for the social democrats to base their tactics upon a mere parliamen- 
tary defensive. 

To fix beforehand the cause and the moment from and in which 
the mass strikes in Germany will break out is not in the power of 
social democracy, because it is not in its power to bring about 
historical situations by resolutions at party congresses. But what it 
can and must do is to make clear the political tendencies, when they 
once appear, and to formulate them as resolute and consistent 
tactics. Man cannot keep historical events in check while making 
recipes for them, but he can see in advance their apparendy calculable 
consequences and arrange his mode of action accordingly. 

The first threatening political danger with which the German 
proletariat have concerned themselves for a number of years, is a 
coup d’etat of the reaction which will wrest from the wide masses of 
the people the most important political right — universal suffrage. 
In spite of the immense importance of this possible event it is, as we 
have already said, impossible to assert with certainty that an open 
popular movement would immediately break out after the coup 
d’etat, because today innumerable circumstances and factors have to 
be taken into account. But when we consider the present extreme 
acuteness of conditions in Germany, and on the other hand, the 
manifold international reactions of the Russian Revolution and of 
the future rejuvenated Russia, it is clear that the collapse of German 
politics which would ensue from the repeal of universal suffrage 
could not alone call a halt to the struggle for this right. This coup 
d’etat would rather draw after it, in a longer or shorter period and 
with elementary power, a great general political reckoning of the 
insurgent and awakened mass of the people — a reckoning with 
bread usury, with artificially caused dearness of meat, with expen- 
diture on a boundless militarism and ‘navalism’, with the corruption 
of colonial policy, with the national disgrace of the Konigsberg trial, 
with the cessation of social reform, with the discharging of railway 
workers, the postal officials and the land workers, with the tricking 
and mocking of the miners, with the judgement of Lobtau and the 



76 



The Mass Strike 



whole system of class justice, with the brutal lock-out system — in 
short with the whole thirty-year-old oppression of the combined 
dominion of Junkerdom and large trustified capital . 24 

But if once the ball is set rolling then social democracy, whether 
it wills it or not, can never again bring it to a standstill. The 
opponents of the mass strike are in the habit of denying that the 
lessons and examples of the Russian Revolution can be a criterion for 
Germany because, in the first place, in Russia the great step must 
first be taken from an Oriental despotism to a modem bourgeois 
legal order. The formal distance between the old and the new 
political order is said to be a sufficient explanation of the vehemence 
and the violence of the revolution in Russia. In Germany we have 
long had the most necessary forms and guarantees of a constitutional 
state, from which it follows that such an elementary raging of social 
antagonisms is impossible here. 

Those who speculate thus forget that in Germany, when it once 
comes to the outbreak of open political struggles, even the historically 
determined goal will be quite different from that in Russia today. 
Precisely because the bourgeois legal order in Germany has existed 
for a long time, because therefore it had time to completely exhaust 
itself and to draw to an end, because bourgeois democracy and 
liberalism have had time to die out — because of this there can no 
longer be any talk of a bourgeois revolution in Germany. And there- 
fore in a period of open political popular straggles in Germany the 
last historical necessary goal can only be the dictatorship of the 
proletariat. The distance, however, of this task from the present 
conditions of Germany is still greater than that of the bourgeois legal 
order from Oriental despotism, and therefore, the task cannot be 
completed at one stroke, but must similarly be accomplished during 
a long period of gigantic social struggles. 

But is there not a gross contradiction in the picture we have 
drawn? On the one hand it means that in an eventual future period of 
political mass action the most backward layers of the German prole- 
tariat — the land workers, the railwaymen, and the postal slaves — 
will first of all win the right of combination, and that the worst 
excrescences of exploitation must first be removed, and on the other 
hand, the political task of this period is said to be the conquest of 



The role of the mass strike in the revolution 



77 



power by the proletariat! On the one hand, economic, trade union 
struggles for the most immediate interests, for the material elevation 
of the working class; on the other hand, the ultimate goal of social 
democracy! Certainly these are great contradictions, but they are not 
contradictions due to our reasoning, but contradictions due to cap- 
italist development. It does not proceed in a beautiful straight line 
but in a lightning-like zigzag. Just as the various capitalist countries 
represent the most varied stages of development, so within each 
country the different layers of the same working class are represented. 
But history does not wait patiently till the backward countries and 
the most advanced layers have joined together so that the whole mass 
can move symmetrically forward like a compact column. It brings 
the best prepared parts to explosion as soon as conditions there are 
ripe for it, and then in the storm of the revolutionary period, lost 
ground is recovered, unequal things are equalised, and the whole 
pace of social progress changed at one stroke to the double-quick. 

Just as in the Russian Revolution all the grades of development 
and all the interests of the different layers of workers are united in 
the social democratic programme of the revolution, and the innumer- 
able partial struggles united in the great common class action of the 
proletariat, so will it also be in Germany when the conditions are ripe 
for it. And the task of social democracy will then be to regulate its 
tactics, not by the most backward phases of development but by the 
most advanced. 



78 



The Mass Strike 



Chapter Eight 

NEED FOR UNITED ACTION OF 
TRADE UNIONS AND SOCIAL DEMOCRACY 



THE MOST important desideratum which is to be hoped for from the 
German working class in the period of great struggles which will 
come sooner or later is, after complete resoluteness and consistency 
of tactics, the utmost capacity for action, and therefore the utmost 
possible unity of the leading social democratic part of the proletarian 
masses. Meanwhile the first weak attempts at the preparation of 
great mass actions have discovered a serious drawback in this con- 
nection: the total separation and independence of the two organisa- 
tions of the labour movement, the social democracy and the trade 
unions. 

It is clear, on a closer consideration of the mass strikes in Russia 
as well as of the conditions in Germany itself, that any great mass 
action, if it is not confined to a mere one-day demonstration, but is 
intended to be a real fighting action, cannot possibly be thought of as 
a so-called political mass strike. In such an action in Germany the 
trade unions would be implicated as much as the social democrats. 
Not because the trade union leaders imagine that the social democrats, 
in view of their smaller organisation, would have no other resources 
than the co-operation of one and a quarter million trade unionists 
and without them would be unable to do anything, but because of a 
much more deep-lying motive: because every direct mass action of 
the period of open class struggles would be at the same time both 
political and economic. If in Germany, from any cause and at any 
time, it should come to great political struggles, to mass strikes, then 
at that time an era of violent trade union struggles would begin in 
Germany and events would not stop to inquire whether the trade 



Need for United Action 



79 



union leaders had given their consent to the movement or not. 
Whether they stand aside or endeavour to resist the movement, the 
result of their attitude will only be that the trade union leaders, like 
the party leaders in the analogous case, will simply be swept aside by 
the rush of events, and the economic and the political struggles of 
the masses will be fought out without them. 

As a matter of fact the separation of the political and the 
economic struggle and the independence of each is nothing but an 
artificial product of the parliamentarian period, even if historically 
determined. On the one hand in the peaceful, ‘normal’ course of 
bourgeois society the economic struggle is split into a multitude of 
individual struggles in every undertaking and dissolved in every 
branch of production. On the other hand the political struggle is not 
directed by the masses themselves in a direct action, but in corres- 
pondence with the form of the bourgeois state, in a representative 
fashion, by the presence of legislative representation. As soon as a 
period of revolutionary struggles commences, that is, as soon as the 
masses appear upon the scene of conflict, the breaking up of the 
economic struggle into many parts, as well as the indirect parliamen- 
tary form of the political struggle ceases; in a revolutionary mass 
action the political and the economic struggle are one, and the 
artificial boundary between trade union and social democracy as two 
separate, wholly independent forms of the labour movement is 
simply swept away. But what finds concrete expression in the revolu- 
tionary mass movement finds expression also in the parliamentary 
period as an actual state of affairs. There are not two different class 
struggles of the working class, an economic and a political one, but 
only one class struggle, which aims at one and the same time at the 
limitation of capitalist exploitation within bourgeois society, and at 
the abolition of exploitation together with bourgeois society itself. 

When these two sides of the class struggle are separated from 
one another for technical reasons in the parliamentary period, there 
they do not form two parallel concurrent actions, but merely two 
phases, two stages of the struggle for emancipation of the working 
class. The trade union struggle embraces the immediate interests, 
and the social democratic struggle the future interests, of the labour 
movement. The communists, says the Communist Manifesto, 



80 



The Mass Strike 



represent, as against various group interests, national or local, of the 
proletariat, the common interests of the proletariat as a whole, and in 
the various stages of development of the class struggle they represent 
the interests of the whole movement, that is, the ultimate goal — the 
liberation of the proletariat. The trade unions represent not only the 
group interests and only one stage of development of the labour 
movement. Social democracy represents the working class and the 
cause of its liberation as a whole. The relation of the trade unions to 
social democracy is therefore a part of the whole, and when, amongst 
the trade union leaders, the theory of ‘equal authority’ of trade 
unions and social democracy finds so much favour, it rests upon a 
fundamental misconception of the essence of trade unionism itself 
and of its role in the general struggle for freedom of the working 
class. 

This theory of the parallel action of social democracy and the 
trade unions and of their ‘equal authority’, is nevertheless not 
altogether without foundation, but has its historical roots. It rests 
upon the illusion of the peaceful ‘normal’ period of bourgeois society, 
in which the political struggle of social democracy appears to be 
consumed in the parliamentary struggle. The parliamentary struggle, 
however, the counterpan of the trade union struggle, is equally, 
with it, a fight conducted exclusively on the basis of the bourgeois 
social order. It is by its very nature, political reform work, as that of 
the trade unions is economic reform work. It represents political 
work for the present, as trade unions represent economic work for 
the present. It is, like them, merely a phase, a stage of development 
in the complete process of the proletarian class struggle whose 
ultimate goal is as far beyond the parliamentarian struggle as it is 
beyond the trade union struggle. The parliamentary struggle is, in 
relation to social democratic policy, also a part of the whole exactly as 
trade union struggle is. Social democracy today comprises the parlia- 
mentary and the trade union struggle in one class struggle aiming at 
the abolition of the bourgeois social order. 

The theory of the ‘equal authority’ of trade unions and social 
democracy is likewise not a mere theoretical misunderstanding, not 
a mere case of confusion but an expression of the well-known 
tendency of that opportunist wing of social democracy which reduces 



Need for United Action 



81 



the political struggle of the working class to the parliamentary 
contest, and desires to change social democracy from a revolutionary 
proletarian party into a petit-bourgeois reform one . 25 If social demo- 
cracy should accept the theory of the ‘equal authority’ of the trade 
unions it would thereby accept, indirectly, and tacidy, that trans- 
formation which has long been striven for by the representatives of the 
opportunist tendency. 

In Germany, however, there is such a shifting of relations 
within the labour movement as is impossible in any other country. 
The theoretical conception according to which the trade unions are 
merely a part of social democracy, finds its classic expression in 
Germany in fact, in actual practice, and that in three directions. 
First, the German trade unions are a direct product of social demo- 
cracy; it was social democracy which created the beginnings of the 
present trade union movement in Germany and which enabled it to 
attain such great dimensions, and it is social democracy which 
supplies it to this day with its leaders and the most active promoters 
of its organisation. 

Second, the German trade unions are a product of social demo- 
cracy also in the sense that social democratic teaching is the soul of 
trade union practice, as the trade unions owe their superiority over 
all bourgeois and denominational trade unions to the idea of the class 
struggle; their practical success, their power, are a result of the 
circumstance that their practice is illuminated by the theory of 
scientific socialism and they are thereby raised above the level of a 
narrow-minded socialism. The strength of the ‘practical policy’ of 
the German trade unions lies in their insight into the deeper social 
and economic connections of the capitalist system, but they owe this 
insight entirely to the theory of scientific socialism upon which their 
practice is based. Viewed in this way, any attempt to emancipate the 
trade unions from the social democratic theory, in favour of some 
other ‘trade union theory’ opposed to social democracy, is, from the 
standpoint of the trade unions themselves and of their future, 
nothing but an attempt to commit suicide. The separation of trade 
union practice from the theory of scientific socialism would mean to 
the German trade unions the immediate loss of all their superiority 
over all kinds of bourgeois trade unions, and their fall from their 



82 



The Mass Strike 



present height to the level of unsteady groping and mere dull 
empiricism. 

Thirdly and finally, the trade unions are, although their leaders 
have gradually lost sight of the fact, even as regards their numerical 
strength, a direct product of the social democratic movement and 
the social democratic agitation. It is true that in many districts trade 
union agitation precedes social democratic agitation, and that every- 
where trade union work prepares the way for party work. From the 
point of view of effect, party and trade unions assist each other to the 
fullest extent. But when the picture of the class struggle in Germany 
is looked at as a whole, and its more deep-seated associations, the 
proportions are considerably altered. Many trade union leaders are 
in the habit of looking down triumphandy from the proud height of 
their membership of one and a quarter millions on the miserable, 
organised members of the Social Democratic Party, not yet half a 
million strong, and of recalling the time, ten or twelve years ago, 
when those in the ranks of social democracy were pessimistic as to 
the prospects of trade-union development. 

They do see that between these two things — the large number 
of organised trade unionists and the small number of organised 
social democrats — there exists in a certain degree a direct causal 
connection. Thousands and thousands of workers do not join the 
party organisations precisely because they join the trade unions. 
According to the theory, all the workers must be doubly organised, 
must attend two kinds of meetings, pay double contributions, read 
two kinds of workers’ papers, etc. But for this it is necessary to have 
a higher standard of intelligence and of that idealism which, from a 
pure feeling of duty to the labour movement, is prepared for the 
daily sacrifice of time and money, and finally, a higher standard of 
that passionate interest in the actual life of the party which can only 
be engendered by membership of the party organisation. All this is 
true of the most enlightened and intelligent minority of social demo- 
cratic workers in the large towns, where party life is full and attractive 
and where the workers’ standard of living is high. Amongst the 
wider sections of the working masses in the large towns, however, as 
well as in the provinces, in the smaller and the smallest towns where 
local political life is not an independent thing but a mere reflex of the 



Need for United Action 



83 



course of events in the capital, where consequently, party life is poor 
and monotonous, and where finally, the economic standard of life of 
the workers is, for the most part, miserable, it is very difficult to 
secure the double form of organisation. 

For the social democratically-minded worker from the masses 
the question will be solved by his joining his trade union. The 
immediate interests of his economic struggle, which are conditioned 
by the nature of the struggle itself, cannot be advanced in any other 
way than by membership of a trade union organisation. The con- 
tribution which he pays, often amidst considerable sacrifice of his 
standard of living, bring him immediate, visible results. His social 
democratic inclinations, however, enable him to participate in various 
kinds of work without belonging to a special party organisation; by 
voting at parliamentary elections, by attendance at social democratic 
public meetings, by following the reports of social democratic 
speeches in representative bodies, and by reading the party press. 
Compare in this connection the number of social democratic electors 
or the number of subscribers to Vorwarts 26 with the number of 
organised party members in Berlin! 

And what is most decisive, the social democratically minded 
average worker who, as a simple man, can have no understanding of 
the intricate and fine ‘two-soul theory’ so-called, feels that he is, 
even in the trade union, social democratically organised. Although 
the central committees of the unions have no official party label, the 
workman from the masses in every city and town sees at the head of 
his trade union, as the most active leaders, those colleagues whom he 
knows also as comrades and social democrats in public life, now as 
Reichstag, Landtag 27 or local representatives, now as trusted men of 
the social democracy, members of election committees, party editors 
and secretaries, or merely as speakers and agitators. Further, he 
hears expressed in the agitational work of his trade union much the 
same ideas, pleasing and intelligible to him, of capitalist exploitation, 
class relations, etc, as those that have come to him from social 
democratic agitation. Indeed, the most and best loved of the speakers 
at trade union meetings are those same social democrats. 

Thus everything combines to give the average class-conscious 
worker the feeling that he, in being organised in his trade union, is 



84 



The Mass Strike 



also a member of his labour party and is social democratically 
organised, and therein lies the peculiar recruiting strength of the German 
trade unions. Not because of the appearance of neutrality, but because 
of the social democratic reality of their being, have the central 
unions been enabled to attain their present strength. This is simply 
through the co-existence of the various unions — Catholic, Hirsch- 
Dunker, etc . 28 — founded by bourgeois parties, by which it was 
sought to establish the necessity for that political ‘neutrality’. When 
the German worker, who has full freedom of choice to attach himself 
to a Christian, Catholic, Evangelical or Free-thinking trade union, 
chooses none of these but the ‘free trade union’ instead, or leaves one 
of the former to join the latter, he does so only because he considers 
that the central unions are the avowed organisations of the modern 
class struggle or, what is the same thing in Germany, that they are 
social democratic trade unions. 

In a word the appearance of ‘neutrality’, which exists in the 
minds of many trade union leaders, does not exist for the mass of 
organised trade unionists. And that is the good fortune of the trade 
union movement. If the appearance of ‘neutrality’, that alienation 
and separation of the trade unions from social democracy, really and 
truly becomes a reality in the eyes of the proletarian masses then the 
trade unions would immediately lose all their advantages over com- 
peting bourgeois unions, and therewith their recruiting power, their 
living fire. This is conclusively proved by facts which are generally 
known. The appearance of party-political ‘neutrality’ of the trade 
union could, as a means of attraction, render inestimable service in a 
country in which social democracy itself has no credit among the 
masses, in which the odium attaching a workers’ organisation injures 
it in the eyes of the masses rather than advantages it — where, in a 
word, the trade unions must first of all recruit their troops from a 
wholly unenlightened, bourgeois-minded mass. 

The best example of such a country was, throughout the whole 
of the last century, and is to a certain extent today — Great Britain. 
In Germany, however, party relations are altogether different. In a 
country in which social democracy is the most powerful political 
party, in which its recruiting power is represented by an army of 
over three million proletarians, it is ridiculous to speak of the 



Need for United Action 



85 



deterrent effect of social democracy and of the necessity for a fighting 
organisation of the workers to ensure political neutrality. The mere 
comparison of the figures of social democratic voters with the figures 
of the trade union organisations in Germany is sufficient to prove to 
the most simple-minded that the trade unions in Germany do not, as 
in England, draw their troops from the unenlightened bourgeois- 
minded mass, but from the mass of proletarians already aroused by 
the social democracy and won by it to the idea of the class struggle. 
Many trade union leaders indignantly reject the idea — a requisite of 
the theory of neutrality’ — and regard the trade unions as a recruiting 
school for social democracy. This apparently insulting, but in reality 
highly flattering presumption is in Germany reduced to mere fancy 
by the circumstance that the positions are reversed; it is the social 
democracy which is the recruiting school for the trade unions. 

Moreover, if the organisational work of the trade unions is for 
the most part of a very difficult and troublesome kind, it is, with the 
exception of a few cases and some districts, not merely because on 
the whole the soil has not been prepared by the social democratic 
plough, but also because the trade union seed itself and the sower as 
well must also be ‘red’, social democratic, before the harvest can 
prosper . But when we compare in this way the figures of trade union 
strength, not with those of the social democratic organisations but 
— which is the only correct way — with those of the mass of social 
democratic voters, we come to a conclusion which differs considerably 
from the current view of the matter. The fact then comes to light that 
the ‘free trade unions’ actually represent today but a minority of the 
class-conscious workers of Germany, that even with their one and a 
quarter million organised members they have not yet been able to 
draw into their ranks one half of those already aroused by social 
democracy. 

The most important conclusion to be drawn from the facts 
above cited is that the complete unity of the trade union and the social 
democratic movements which is absolutely necessary for the coming 
mass struggles in Germany is actually here, and that it is incorporated 
in the wide mass which forms the basis at once of social democracy 
and trade unionism, and in whose consciousness both parts of the 
movement are mingled in a mental unity. The alleged antagonism 



86 



The Mass Strike 












between social democracy and trade unions shrinks to an antagonism 
between social democracy and a certain part of the trade union 
officials, which is, however, at the same time an antagonism within 
the trade unions between this part of the trade union leaders and the 
proletarian mass organised in trade unions. 

The rapid growth of the trade union movement in Germany in 
the course of the last fifteen years, especially in the period of great 
economic prosperity from 1895 to 1900, has brought with it a great 
independence of the trade unions, a specialising of their methods of 
struggle, and finally the introduction of a regular trade union offi- 
cialdom. All these phenomena are quite understandable and natural 
historical products of the growth of the trade unions in this fifteen- 
year period, and of the economic prosperity and political calm of 
Germany. They are, although inseparable from certain drawbacks, 
without doubt an historically necessary evil. But the dialectics of 
development also brings with it the circumstance that these necessary 
means of promoting trade union growth become, on the contrary, 
obstacles to its further development at a certain stage of organisation 
and at a certain degree of ripeness of conditions. 

The specialisation of professional activity as trade union leaders, 
as well as the naturally restricted horizon which is bound up with 
disconnected economic struggles in a peaceful period, leads only too 
easily, amongst trade union officials, to bureaucratism and a certain 
narrowness of outlook. Both, however, express themselves in a 
whole series of tendencies which may be fateful in the highest degree 
for the future of the trade union movement. There is first of all the 
over-valuation of the organisation, which from a means has gradually 
been changed into an end in itself, a precious thing, to which the 
interests of the struggles should be subordinated. From this also 
comes that openly admitted need for peace which shrinks from great 
risks and presumed dangers to the stability of the trade unions, and 
further, the over-valuation of the trade union method of struggle 
itself, its prospects and its successes. 

The trade union leaders, constantly absorbed in the economic 
guerrilla war whose plausible task it is to make the workers place the 
highest value on the smallest economic achievement, every increase 
in wages and shortening of the working day, gradually lose the power 



! 



Need for United Action 



87 



of seeing the larger connections and of taking a survey of the whole 
position. Only in this way can one explain why many trade union 
leaders refer with the greatest satisfaction to the achievements of the 
last fifteen years, instead of, on the contrary, emphasising the other 
side of the medal; the simultaneous and immense reduction of the 
proletarian standard of life by land usury, by the whole tax and 
customs policy, by landlord rapacity which has increased house 
rents to such an exorbitant extent, in short, by all the objective 
tendencies of bourgeois policy which have largely neutralised the 
advantages of the fifteen years of trade union struggle. From the 
whole social democratic truth which, while emphasising the import- 
ance of the present work and its absolute necessity, attaches the 
chief importance to the criticism and the limits to this work, the half 
trade union truth is taken which emphasises only the positive side of 
the daily struggle. 

And finally, from the concealment of the objective limits drawn 
by the bourgeois social order to the trade union struggle, there arises 
a connection with the ultimate aims of the labour movement. Fulsome 
flattery and boundless optimism are considered to be the duty of 
every ‘friend of the trade union movement’. But as the social 
democratic standpoint consists precisely in fighting against uncritical 
trade union optimism, as in fighting against uncritical parliamentary 
optimism, a front is at last made against the social democratic 
theory: men grope for a ‘new trade union theory’, that is, a theory 
which would open an illimitable vista of economic progress to the 
trade union struggle within the capitalist system, in opposition to the 
social democratic doctrine. Such a theory has indeed existed for 
some time — the theory of Professor Sombart which was promulgated 
with the express intention of driving a wedge between the trade 
unions and the social democracy in Germany, and of enticing the 
trade unions over to the bourgeois position. 

In close connection with these theoretical tendencies is a revo- 
lution in the relations of leaders and rank and file. In place of the 
direction by colleagues through local committees, with their admitted 
inadequacy, there appears the business-like direction of the trade 
union officials. The initiative and the power of making decisions 
thereby devolve upon trade union specialists, so to speak, and the 



88 



The Mass Strike 



more passive virtue of discipline upon the mass of members. This 
dark side of officialdom also assuredly conceals considerable dangers 
for the party, as from the latest innovation, the institution of local 
party secretariats, it can quite easily result, if the social democratic 
mass is not careful, that these secretariats may remain mere organs 
for carrying out decisions and not be regarded in any way the 
appointed bearers of the initiative and of the direction of local party 
life. But by the nature of the case, by the character of the political 
struggle, there are narrow bounds drawn to bureaucratism in social 
democracy as in trade union life. 

But here the technical specialising of wage struggles as, for 
example, the conclusion of intricate tariff agreements and the like, 
frequently means that the mass of organised workers are prohibited 
from taking a ‘survey of the whole industrial life’, and their incapacity 
for taking decisions is thereby established. A consequence of this 
conception is the argument with which every theoretical criticism of 
the prospects and possibilities of trade union practice is tabooed and 
which alleges that it represents a danger to the pious trade union 
sentiment of the masses. From this the point of view has been 
developed that it is only by blind, childlike faith in the efficacy of the 
trade union struggle that the working masses can be won and held 
for the organisation. In contradistinction to social democracy, which 
bases its influence on the unity of the masses amidst the contradictions 
of the existing order and in the complicated character of its develop- 
ment, and on the critical attitude of the masses to all factors and 
stages of their own class struggle, the influence and the power of the 
trade unions are founded upon the upside down theory of the 
incapacity of the masses for criticism and decision. ‘The faith of the 
people must be maintained’ — that is the fundamental principle, 
acting upon which many trade union officials stamp as attempts on 
the life of this movement all criticisms of the objective inadequacy of 
trade unionism. 

And finally, a result of this specialisation and this bureaucratism 
amongst trade union officials is the great independence and the 
‘neutrality’ of the trade unions in relation to social democracy. The 
extreme independence of the trade union organisation has resulted 
as a natural condition from its growth, as a relation which has grown 



Need for United Action 



89 



out of the technical division ofLwork between the political and the 
trade union forms of struggle. The ‘neutrality’ of the German trade 
unions, on its part, arose as a product of the reactionary trade union 
legislation of the Prusso-German police state. With time, both aspects 
of their nature have altered. From the condition of political ‘neutral- 
ity’ of the trade unions imposed by the police, a theory of their 
voluntary neutrality has been evolved as a necessity founded upon 
the alleged nature of the trade union struggle itself. And the technical 
independence of the trade unions, which should rest upon the 
division of work in the unified social democratic class struggle, the 
separation of the trade unions from social democracy, from its views 
and its leadership, has been changed into the so-called ‘equal author- 
ity’ of trade unions and social democracy. 

This appearance of separation and equality of trade unions and 
social democracy is, however, incorporated chiefly in the trade 
union officials, and strengthened through the managing apparatus 
of the trade unions. Outwardly, by the co-existence of a complete 
staff of trade union officials, of a wholly independent central com- 
mittee, a numerous professional press, and finally, of a trade union 
congress, the illusion is created of an exact parallel with the manag- 
ing apparatus of the social democracy, the party executive, the party 
press and the party conference. This illusion of equality between 
social democracy and the trade union has led to, amongst other 
things, the monstrous spectacle that, in part, quite analogous agendas 
are discussed at social democratic conferences and trade union 
congresses, and that on the same questions different, and even 
diametrically opposite, decisions are taken. From the natural divi- 
sion of work between the party conference, which represents the 
general interests and tasks of the labour movement, and the trade 
union congress (which deals with the much narrower sphere of social 
questions and interests), the artificial division has been made of a 
pretended trade union and a social democratic outlook in relation to 
the same general questions and interests of the labour movement. 

Thus the peculiar position has arisen that this same trade union 
movement which below, in the wide proletarian masses, is absolute- 
ly one with social democracy, parts abruptly from it above, in the 
superstructure of management, and sets itself up as an independent 



90 



The Mass Strike 




great power. The German labour movement therefore assumes the 
peculiar form of a double pyramid whose base and body consist of 
one solid mass but whose apices are wide apart. 

It is clear from this presentation of the case in what way alone, 
in a natural and successful manner, that compact unity of the 
German labour movement can be attained which, in view of the 
coming political class struggles and of the peculiar interest of the 
further development of the trade unions, is indispensably necessary. 
Nothing could be more perverse or more hopeless than to desire to 
attain the unity desired by means of sporadic and periodical negoti- 
ations on individual questions affecting the labour movement between 
the Social Democratic Party leadership and the trade union central 
committees. It is just the highest circles of both forms of the labour 
movement which, as we have seen, incorporate their separation and 
self-sufficiency, which are themselves, therefore, the promoters of 
the illusion of the ‘equal authority’ and of the parallel existence of 
social democracy and trade unionism. 

To desire the unity of these through the union of the party 
executive and the general commission [of the trade unions] is to 
desire to build a bridge at the very spot where the distance is greatest 
and the crossing most difficult. Not above, amongst the heads of the 
leading directing organisations and in their federative alliance, but 
below, amongst the organised proletarian masses, lies the guarantee 
of the real unity of the labour movement. In the consciousness of the 
million trade unionists, the party and the trade unions are actually 
one, they represent in different forms the social democratic struggle 
for the emancipation of the proletariat. And the necessity automati- 
cally arises therefrom of removing any causes of friction which have 
arisen between the social democracy and a part of the trade unions, of 
adapting their mutual relation to the consciousness of the proletarian 
masses, that is, of rejoining the trade unions to social democracy. The 
synthesis of the real development which led from the original incor- 
poration of the trade unions to their separation from social democracy 
will thereby be expressed, and the way will be prepared for the coming 
period of great proletarian mass struggles during the period of 
vigorous growth, of both trade unions and social democracy, and 
their reunion in the interests of both, will become a necessity. 



Need for United Action 



91 



It is not, of course, a question of the merging of the trade union 
organisation in the party, but of the restoration of the unity of social 
democracy and the trade unions which corresponds to the actual 
relation between the labour movement as a whole and its partial 
trade union expression. Such a revolution will inevitably call forth a 
vigorous opposition from a part of the trade union leadership. But it 
is high time for the working masses of social democracy to learn how 
to express their capacity for decision and action, and therewith to 
demonstrate their ripeness for that time of great struggles and great 
tasks in which they, the masses, will be the actual chorus and the 
directing bodies will merely act the ‘speaking parts’, that is, will only 
be the interpreters of the will of the masses. 

The trade union movement is not that which is reflected in the 
quite understandable but irrational illusion of a minority of the trade 
union leaders, but that which lives in the consciousness of the mass 
of proletarians who have been won for the class struggle. In this 
consciousness the trade union movement is a part of social democracy, 
‘And what it is, that should it dare to appear’. 



92 



The Mass Strike 



NOTES 



1. References throughout are to the Russian Revolution of 1905. 
Rosa Luxemburg wrote The Mass Strike in the summer of 
1906. 

2. The German Social Democratic Party (spd) was at the time the 
world’s largest socialist party, claiming nearly a million members 
and publishing scores of papers every day. It had a massive 
bureaucracy of full-time officials, both political and trade union, 
and was prone to see a divide between poltical and economic 
struggle. Rosa Luxemburg spent most of her life in Germany in 
exile from her native Poland, and she became a leading member 
of the revolutionary tendency inside the spd. The Mass Strike 
was written partly as a contribution to debates inside the party, 
as its full title. The Mass Strike, the Political Party and the 
Trade Unions, shows. 

3. The ‘lumpenproletariat’ is what Marx calls ‘the stagnant ele- 
ment’, those permanently excluded from the process of produc- 
tion (in distinction to the proletariat, the working class), among 
whom he includes ‘vagabonds, criminals, prostitutes ... the 
demoralised, the ragged . . .’ 

4. The International Workingmen’s Association, or ‘First Inter- 
national’, which was set up by Marx and Engels in 1864. 

5 . Eduard Bernstein and Kurt Eisner, two leading members of the 
German spd. 

6. Kladderadatsch means a great noise, or hubbub. 

7. The Russian national assembly. 

8. At the Congress of the SPD in autumn 1905 at Jena there was a 
debate about whether the party should at any time consider 
calling for a mass strike by workers. The ‘Jena resolution’, 
which was passed, approved the calling of a general strike — but 
only if the government attempted to restrict the right to vote. 

9. At the German Trade Union Congress, which followed the Jena 
Congress, even a theoretical discussion of the general strike 
tactic was labelled as ‘playing with fire’ and banned. Thus the 



Notes 



93 



trade union congress, whose leadership were SPD members, was 
in contradiction of party policy. A secret meeting of SPD and 
union leaders in February 1906 agreed, however, that the Jena 
resolution would be quiedy buried — and the SPD’s 1906 Con- 
gress officially declared that there was no contradiction between 
the Jena resolution and the trade union position adopted at 
Cologne. 

10. The Russian Social Democratic Party (rsdlp), which was to 
divide into two wings at its 1903 Congress: the Bolsheviks and 
Mensheviks. 

1 1 . War broke out between Russia and Japan in Febuary 1904. It 
ended within the year in defeat for Russia. 

12. The Tsar’s mounted troops, noted for their brutality. 

13. Sergei Zubatov was chief of the Tsarist police in Moscow. He 
organised workers into ‘unions’ under police auspices as a way 
of trying to prevent strikes. 

14. Osvoboshdenye was the paper published abroad by the Russian 
Liberals. Peter Struve, its editor, was a former Social Democrat. 

15. The ruling clique. 

16. Along with the eight-hour day, the petition to be presented to 
the Tsar also asked for freedom of speech and the press, the 
separation of church and state, land for the peasants, freedom of 
assembly for the workers, an end to the war with Japan, and the 
calling of a Constituent Assembly. 

17. The Tsar’s troops fired on the crowd, then horsemen charged 
with sabres. The exact figures are unknown, but more than a 
thousand people were killed and many more wounded. 

18. The zemstvos were rural assemblies, dominated by the nobility 
and the Liberals and with severely limited powers. 

19. Both Poland and Lithuania were ruled by Russia in 1905. Rosa 
Luxemburg managed to smuggle herself into Poland in Decem- 
ber 1905 and remained there until she was arrested in March 
1906. The information here concerning the extent of the strikes 
she presumably collected personally. 

20. This is the Petersburg Soviet. 

2 1 . Bulygin was the Tsar’s minister for the interior. In response to 
the mass strikes of 1905, the government offered to set up a 



94 



The Mass Strike 



Duma, or representative assembly. The process by which it was 
to be elected, however, was openly undemocratic: as Lenin put 
it: . . the vote of a landlord was equal to three votes by the 

urban bourgeoisie, 15 peasant votes and 45 workers’ votes.’ 
(Works, volume 12, pages 513-4.) 

22. The concessions made by the Tsar in an attempt to halt the 
revolution. 

23. These laws banned organisations and publications in Germany 
from engaging in socialist propaganda; only parliamentary activ 
ity was allowed. They were repealed in 1890. 

24 . The Konigsberg T rial and the J udgement of Lobtau were causes 
celebres of the time. The Junkers were members of the Prussian 
landed aristocracy, known for their extreme militarist and anti- 
democratic views. 

25. Rosa Luxemburg’s own note on this point reads: ‘As the exist- 
ence of such a tendency within German social democracy is 
generally denied, one must be grateful for the candour with 
which the opportunist trend has recently formulated its real 
aims and wishes. At a party meeting in Mayence on 10 September 
1909, the following resolution, proposed by Dr David, was 
carried. 

‘Whereas the Social Democratic Party interprets the term 
“revolution” not in the sense of violent overthrow, but in the 
peaceful sense of development, that is, the gradual realisation of 
a new economic principle, the public party meeting at Mayence 
repudiates every kind of revolutionary romance. 

‘The meeting sees in the conquest of political power nothing 
but the winning over of the majority of the people to the ideas 
and demands of the social democracy; a conquest which cannot 
be achieved by means of violence, but only by the revolutionising 
of the mind by means of intellectual propaganda and practical 
reform work in all spheres of political, economic and social life. 

‘In the conviction that social democracy flourishes far better 
when it employs legal means that when it relies on illegal means 
and revolution, the meeting repudiates “direct mass action” as a 
tactical principle, and holds fast to the principle of “parliamen- 
tary reform action”, that is, it desires that the party in the future 



Notes 



95 



as in the past, shall earnestly endeavour to achieve its aims by 
legislation and gradual organised development. 

‘The indispensable condition for this reformist method of 
struggle is that the possibility of participation of the dispossessed 
masses of the people in the legislation of the empire and of the 
individual states shall not be lessened but increased to the fullest 
possible extent. For this reason, the meeting declares it to be an 
incontestable right of the working class to withhold its labour 
for a longer or shorter period to ward off attacks on its legal 
rights and to gain further rights, when all other means fail. 

‘But as the political mass strike can only be victoriously 
carried through when kept within strictly legal limits and when 
the strikers give no reasonable excuse to the authorities to resort 
to armed force, the meeting perceives the only necessary and 
real preparation for the exercise of this method of struggle in the 
further extension of the political, trade-union and cooperative 
organisations. Because only in this way can the conditions be 
created amongst the wide masses of the people which can guar- 
antee the successful prosecution of a mass strike: conscious 
discipline and adequate economic support.’ 

26. Vorwarts was the national daily paper of the German SPD. 

27. The Reichstag is the German national assembly; the Landtags 
the provincial assemblies. 

28. These were unions under Liberal leadership. 



★ 

Rosa Luxemburg 

by Tony Cliff 

More than half a century after she was murdered , the ideas of Rosa Luxemburg are still 
the subject of passionate debate. Tony Cliffs book, first published in 1950, remains the 
best short introduction to those ideas. Using wherever possible Rosa Luxemburg’s own 
words, it sets out her thinking on reform and revolution, on imperialism and war, on the 
Bolshevik Party and on Marxist economics. Price: £1 .95/US$4.00 

From left-wing bookshops or direct from the publishers: 

BOOKMARKS 

• 265 Seven Sisters Road, Finsbury Park, London N4 2DE, England. 

• PO Box 16085, Chicago, Illinois 60616, USA. 

• GPO Box 1473N, Melbourne 3001, Australia. 



96 



The Mass Strike 



